instant Step By Step Cookbook


Vegan

Instant noodles with sesame
(3 people) (Start 30 minutes before)

Ingredients:
 3 tablespoons sesame seeds

 3 tbsp oil

 2 tablespoons sesame oil

 1-2 cloves of garlic

 1-2 tablespoons of peanut butter

 1 chili

 4 tablespoons soy sauce

 1-2 tablespoons lime juice

 (4 tablespoons chopped fresh coriander)

 250 g Instant noodles

Method:
Start by heating a pan

When the pan is very hot, add 3 tablespoons of sesame seeds and take the pan off the heat

Stir while the pan cools down a bit

Put 1-2 tablespoons of peanut butter in a small bowl with a round bottom (breakfast bowl)

Put 3 tablespoons of neutral oil (grapeseed or sunflower) and 2 tablespoons of sesame oil in the bowl

Stir until the oil is mixed into the peanut butter

Put 1-2 cloves of garlic into the garlic press and press it into the bowl. Stir well

Clean and finely chop the chilli and stir it into the peanut butter mixture

Stir the toasted sesame seeds into the peanut butter mixture

Add 4 tablespoons of soy sauce to the peanut butter mixture and stir well

 Add 2 tablespoons of lime juice to the peanut butter mixture and stir well

Season with salt (approx. ½ teaspoon) and pepper

Cook the instant noodles according to the instructions on the package. (Typically 0.5 L of water is brought to a boil, add the noodles, boil for 4-5 minutes, drain the water)

(Rinse and chop the fresh coriander while the noodles are cooking, put it on a small plate and serve it)

Serve peanut butter mixture and noodles separately or mixed together in the pan

Note: The dish is delicious and easy, but contains a lot of oil. It should not be eaten every day…

(End)
Pak Choi stir fry - easy wok dish
(3-4 people) (Start ½ hour before)

Ingredients:
 450 g Pak Choi (or scallions or Chinese cabbage)

 2 tbsp oil

 1-2 tbsp oyster sauce

Method:
 Start by adding rice (Recipe below)

 Clean and rinse the Pak Choi

 Cut the cabbage into wide strips and cut the strips once or twice

 When the rice is almost cooked, heat deep frying pan or wok

 When the pan is hot, add 2 tablespoons of oil

 Add the cabbage and stir for a few minutes until the cabbage has just collapsed

 Add 1-2 tbsp oyster sauce, stir and serve immediately with rice and extra oyster sauce

(End)
Rice

Hummus - Chickpea paste with cumin
(4 people) (Start 30 minutes(/24 hours before))

Ingredients:
 500 g chickpeas (or 1 can)

 ¾ d Olive oil

 3 cloves of garlic

 3 tablespoons tahini

 (½ teaspoon chili powder)

 2 teaspoons whole cumin

 1 lemon

Method:
 If canned chickpeas are used, skip the next points

 Put the chickpeas in a Margrethe bowl and cover them with water (3 cm above)

 Cover the bowl and let the chickpeas soak for 10-20 hours

 Rinse the chickpeas and put them in a pan

 Cover the chickpeas with water and bring to a boil

 Just before they boil, remove any foam with a spoon (put the foam in a bowl and rinse the bowl afterwards)

 Cook for 45 minutes on 1-2 (out of 9)

 Rinse the chickpeas thoroughly in a colander (/a large sieve)


With meat mincers: (With blender: See at the end)

 Find a Margrethe bowl and add the following:

 ¾ dL olive oil

 3 tablespoons tahini

 3 cloves of garlic pressed through the garlic press

 (½ teaspoon chili powder or 1 teaspoon paprika)

 2 teaspoons cumin finely ground in a mortar

 Juice squeezed from ½ lemon

 1 teaspoon of salt

Run the chickpeas through a meat mincer into the Margrethe bowl

Stir it all together and add cold water a little at a time until the consistency is suitable. Make sure the hummus doesn't become too runny

Season to taste with salt, lemon or cumin

With a blender: You can use an ordinary blender, but then you should start by adding approx. ¾ dL of water in the blender glass together with the other ingredients and then add the chickpeas a little at a time. Otherwise it will be too dry to get down to the knife and you have to constantly stop the blender and scrape down.

If you use a hand blender, be careful not to overheat it. Again, it is important to start with all the liquid. Pull the stick out when scraping down the sides of a blender

(End)
Served with


Pita bread
or


Root vegetables in the oven
Hummus can also be eaten as a spread.


Gazpacho - Cold tomato soup
(4 people) (Start ¾ hour before)

Ingredients:
Especially suitable for a hot summer day. Focaccia bread is the icing on the cake.

1 tsp peeled tomatoes

1½ dL breadcrumbs

2 cloves of garlic

2 tablespoons parsley

½ lemon

½ dL olive oil

2 splashes of Tabasco

2 tomatoes

½ cucumber

½ bell pepper

(1 small onion or 1-2 spring onions)

¾ teaspoon salt

(ice cubes)

Method:
Find a Margret bowl and add 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

Put 1½ dL of breadcrumbs in the bowl

Clean 2 cloves of garlic and add them to the grater and tomato

Rinse the parsley equivalent to approximately 2 tablespoons and add the parsley to the bowl

Squeeze ½ lemon and squeeze the juice into the bowl

Measure out ½ dL of olive oil and pour it into the rest

Add a few splashes of tabasco (...or five)

Blend the contents of the bowl thoroughly with an immersion blender

Finely chop 2 tomatoes and add them to the soup

Finely chop ½ cucumber and add it

Finely chop ½ pepper and add the chopped pepper to the bowl

(Chop 1 small onion or 1-2 spring onions very fine and add the onion to the bowl)

Add ¾ teaspoon of salt to the soup, stir and season with salt and lemon juice. If the soup is too thick, add cold water (If ice cubes are added before serving, the soup must not be diluted too much with water)

Put the soup in the fridge until ready to serve or add ice cubes, stir and serve immediately

Serve with flutes or Focaccia bread

(End)
Minestrone - Vegetable soup with pasta
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 1-2 onions

 1-2 leeks

 2-3 stalks of celery

 2-3 carrots

 (125 g celeriac)

 2-3 sprigs of basil

 1 L broth

 200 g (frozen) green beans or half a tin of white beans

 50 g of spaghetti

Method:
 Chop 1-2 onions so that there is approx. 1½ dL chopped onion

 Clean 1-2 leeks and cut them into slices

 Clean 2-3 stalks of celery and cut them into pieces

 Peel 2-3 carrots and cut them into sticks

 (Cut a slice from a celeriac and peel the piece. Cut into sticks)

 Rinse 2-3 sprigs of basil and pick off the leaves. Discard the stems

 Boil 1 L of water and put the boiling water in a Margrethe bowl together with enough broth for 1 L of water. Stir

 Weigh out 200 g of green beans. If necessary, cut them into 3-4 cm long pieces so that they fit on the spoon when eating

 Weigh out 50 g of spaghetti (no more, many vegetables are filling)

 Saute onions first, then celery, carrots and celery

 Add the carrots and celery to the onions and continue to fry

 Then add the celeriac and saute for 2-5 minutes

 Pour in the broth and let the soup cook for 15 minutes. Remember to set a timer

 Set the table with deep plates and a spoon and a fork for each

 When the timer beeps, add the 50 g of spaghetti. The spaghetti can be broken into smaller pieces if necessary

 Also add the green beans and the basil and cook for 10-12 more minutes until the spaghetti is ready

 Serve with flûtes or grissini

(End)
Thai curry - with coconut, potatoes and broccoli
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 200 g potatoes (1-4 depending on size)

 200 g of broccoli

 1 red bell pepper

 8 minicorns (or 1½ dL corn)

 100 g of spinach

 3 dL vegetable broth

 1 can of coconut milk (400 mL)

 2 tbsp oil

 1-3 tbsp curry paste (red, green or yellow)

 1 teaspoon brown sugar

 1 teaspoon of salt

 (2 tbsp fresh coriander)


 (6 cardamom capsules)

 (1 stalk lemongrass)

Method:
 Peel 200 g potatoes (1-4 depending on size)

 Cut the potatoes into pieces about the size of a walnut and put the pieces in water in a bowl. The pieces must be square.

 Cut 200g of broccoli (about one-third to one-half broccoli) into walnut-sized florets

 Rinse a red pepper and clean it of seeds. Cut it into cubes

 Rinse 8 minicorns and cut off the bottom. Cut each minicorn into 3-4 pieces (or measure out 1½ dL corn kernels)

 Rinse 100 g of spinach in a strainer or colander if you are using fresh spinach. If you use frozen spinach, wait until you take the spinach out of the freezer

 (Rinse and chop approx. 2 tablespoons of fresh coriander and put it on top of the spinach)

 Boil 3 dL of water and put bouillon powder or cubes in a measuring glass. When the water boils, pour it into the measuring cup and stir

 Open the can of coconut milk

 Find curry paste and a teaspoon

 Find a medium sized pot and heat it up

 Put 2 tablespoons of oil in the pan and add 1-3 tablespoons of curry paste, depending on how strong the paste is and how strong you like your food. Stir immediately and fry the pasta briefly

 Add the coconut milk from the can and the 3 dL of broth. Stir

 Add potatoes to the pan, stir and put the lid on

 Turn down to 3 (out of 9) and set a timer for 15 minutes

 Now is the time to add rice (Recipe below)

 When the timer beeps, add mini corn (or corn kernels). Stir and cover. Set the timer to 2 minutes

 When the timer beeps, add the broccoli pieces and the red pepper cubes

 Add 1 teaspoon brown sugar and 1 teaspoon salt. Stir and cover. Set the timer to 2 minutes

 Add the rinsed spinach (or take 100g of frozen spinach from the freezer and add it in)

 Stir and cover. Set the timer to 2 minutes

 Serve with rice, and possibly more fresh coriander when the timer beeps

(End)
Rice

Ratatouille - French classic with tomato, pepper, eggplant and basil
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1-2 onions

 3-4 cloves of garlic

 2 peppers

 1 eggplant

 1 squash (cucumber size)

 2 tbsp olive oil

 1 (good!) tin of peeled tomatoes (or ½ kg of ripe tomatoes)

 1-2 tbsp tomato concentrate

 ½-1 tsp salt

 1 pot of basil

 (2 dL creme fraiche or yogurt)

Creme fraiche is of course not vegan, but it tastes really good with Ratatouille :-)

Method:
 Chop 1-2 onions so that there is approx. 1½ dL chopped onion

 Clean 3-4 cloves of garlic and chop them finely

 Clean 2 sweet peppers and cut them into strips. Cut the strips in half if necessary

 Remove the stem and top of the squash and cut it in half lengthwise. Slice the halves

 Remove the silk from the aubergine, rinse it and cut it into quarters lengthwise. Cut the quarters into slices

 Open the can of peeled tomatoes (or wash the tomatoes and cut out the stem hole. Then cut them into fairly small pieces (eighths))

The taste is significantly better if you saute the vegetables thoroughly separately, so use two pots and two ladles as described below.
The vegetables must be seared hard, but must not burn. It doesn't matter if the bottom of the saute pan turns brown, that's why everything has to be poured back into the saute pan at the end, to get the flavor with it. But it must not turn black.
If the pan turns black, you can pour a splash of boiling water on the saute pan and stir the black away.
Pour out the black water, rinse and dry the pan, then heat it up again.
The water that is poured onto the hot pan should ideally be boiling, as cold water on a very hot pan can make it warp :-(
For the same reason, pans should also cool on the stove or on a trivet, not in the sink.

 Put the tomatoes in a pot big enough for all the vegetables and put it on a burner. Turn up to 5 (out of 9)
Place a ladle ready over the pot to stir later

 Heat a frying pan or a large pot at 9 (out of 9) and add 2 tablespoons of olive oil

 First, fry the onion for a few minutes without it taking on colour

 Add finely chopped garlic and stir briefly

 Add the onion to the pan with the tomato and stir with the tomato spoon

 Add a drizzle of olive oil to the saute pan. Add bell pepper and fry until the bell pepper is soft. Consider whether to turn it down a bit from 9 (out of 9)

 Add the seared peppers to the pan with the tomato and onion, and stir with the tomato spoon

 Add a drizzle of olive oil to the saute pan. Add the aubergine and fry them for a while

 Add the fried aubergines to the pan with tomato, pepper and onion, and stir with the tomato spoon

 Add a drizzle of olive oil to the saute pan. Add squash and fry.

 Add the tomato, pepper, onion and aubergine from the other pan to the squash and stir well.
Be careful when touching. Things can easily fall out. As a rule, it is easiest to stir from the edge towards the center instead of around the edge if the pan is very full

 Season with salt, approx. ½-1 tsp

 Put the lid on and turn down to 2 (out of 9). Set the timer for 25 minutes, but feel free to stir occasionally

 If rice is served, now is the time to put them on top (Recipe below)

 While the ratatouille is cooking, cut all the stems off the basil and rinse them. The leaves are then peeled off the stems and placed on a plate. If the leaves are very large, they may need to be roughly chopped

 When the timer rings, remove the lid and stir in 1 teaspoon of salt and 1 tablespoon of tomato concentrate. Taste the ratatouille and, if necessary, add more salt and tomato concentrate. If the taste is too sour, ½-1 teaspoon of sugar can be good. If the ratatouille is a bit thin, cook it for a while without the lid. Remember to turn on the hood (and to wear earplugs if the noise bothers you)

 Sprinkle the basil leaves in the pan, stir and serve with 2 dL yoghurt or creme fraiche

(End)
Sliced ​​wholemeal bread can be served with rice or Emigrant Bread


Rice

Emigrant Bread

Dall - Indian lentils with spices
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
Dall

 1-2 onions

 2-4 cloves of garlic

 1 tablespoon garam masala (recipe below if you can't find it in a store)

 1 tablespoon curry

 1 tablespoon paprika

 ¼ teaspoon chilli

 1 teaspoon of salt

 1-2 tbsp oil

 3 dL red lentils

 6 dL of water

 Accessories: 1 bag of tortilla chips or 1 portion of chappaties (Recipe for chappaties below)


Garam Masala spice mix

 10-12 whole cardamom capsules

 1 ½ tsp whole peppercorns

 4 tbsp whole coriander seeds

 2 teaspoons whole cumin

 6-8 whole cloves

 2 teaspoons of cinnamon

Method:
Start by making garam masala if you don't have any:

Garam Masala

 Find an empty spice jar for when the spice mixture is finished

 Place 10-12 whole cardamom capsules on the table and grind them with the pestle from the mortar. Peel the black seeds from the shells and put the seeds in the mortar (If the seeds are brown, it is too old cardamom. It can be used, but the taste is not quite as good)

 Put 1 ½ teaspoons of whole peppercorns in the mortar

 Put 4 tablespoons of whole coriander seeds in the mortar.

 Put 2 teaspoons of whole cumin in the mortar.

 Put 6-8 whole cloves in the mortar and put the mortar on a tea towel so it doesn't scratch the table and grind/grind/pound the spices into powder

 Put 2 teaspoons of cinnamon in the mortar

 Stir the spice mixture well and put it in an empty spice jar. Remember to put a label on the jar or attach a small piece of paper to the lid that says Garam Masala


Dall

 Put 2 tablespoons of garam masala in the mortar (or in a glass)

 Put 1 tablespoon of curry in the mortar

 Put 1 tablespoon of paprika in the mortar

 Put ¼ teaspoon chilli in the mortar

 Put 1 teaspoon of salt in the mortar and stir the spices around

 Measure out 6 dL of water

 Measure out 3 dL of red lentils and put them in a strainer. Rinse them under running water until the water is clear. Leave them in the strainer until ready to use

 Chop 1-2 onions

 Peel 2-4 cloves of garlic and chop them finely

 Heat a small pan and add 1 tablespoon of oil

 fry the onion and garlic without colouring

 Add the spice mixture and stir briefly

 Add the washed lentils and stir

 Add the 6 dL of water and stir well at the bottom.

 Put lid on and turn down to 1 (out of 9)

 Set the timer for 30 minutes and set the table

 Serve with tortilla chips, chappaties or rice

(End)
Chappaties

Rice

Black beans with sage
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 1 can of black beans

 1 onion

 1-2 cloves of garlic

 1-2 chillies

 2 tablespoons balsamic vinegar

 1 tablespoon brown sugar

 ½ tsp peeled tomatoes

 1 tablespoon soy sauce

 6 leaves fresh sage (1 tbsp dried)

 ½ bunch parsley

 ½ bunch of basil

 6-8 capsules whole cardamom

 1-2 dL water (or wine)

 The peel of 1 organic lemon

 (2 tbsp sesame seeds)

 (1 pack of grissini)

Method:
 Open 1 can of black beans and pour them into a colander. Rinse the beans and let them drain

 Clean and chop 1 onion

 Clean and chop 2-4 cloves of garlic

 Clean and chop 1-2 chillies

 Chop ½ bunch of parsley and ½ bunch of basil, as well as 6 fresh sage leaves.
If you use dried sage, add 1 tablespoon on top of the fresh herbs now

 Heat up a saute pan or a large pot and add 1 tablespoon of oil

 Saute onion first, then garlic and chilli

 Turn down the heat and add 1 tablespoon of brown sugar. Stir briefly

 Add 2 tablespoons of balsamic vinegar and stir for half a minute until everything browns lightly

 Add ½ can of peeled tomatoes and stir.

Freeze the other half in a freezer bag. If you leave the bag flat in the freezer, it is easy to thaw when you need to use the rest. Remember to put a sticker on

 Add herbs and 6-8 capsules of whole cardamom

 If necessary, add a little water (or wine) until the consistency is suitable

 Bring to the boil and reduce to 2 (out of 9). Let it boil for 30 minutes. Remember to set a timer

 While it is boiling, grate the peel of an organic lemon on a plate

 If using sesame seeds: Heat a pan until it is quite hot and add 2 tablespoons of sesame seeds to the pan. Remove the pan from the heat and stir in the sesame seeds until they have cooled slightly (1-2 minutes).

 When the timer rings, stir in the lemon zest, and the beans are served with the toasted sesame seeds and possibly grissini or Emigrant Bread

(End)
Emigrant Bread

"Drowned" beans - Chilli san carne with beer
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 2 cans of beans (preferably different kinds)

 1 onion

 2-4 cloves of garlic

 (2-3 stalks of celery)

 1-2 chillies

 1 tablespoon of oregano

 1 tablespoon cumin

 3 dL beer (a bottle/can of 33 cL) or broth

 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

 2 tbsp tomato concentrate

 1 teaspoon (smoke) salt

 (taco chips)

Method:
 Open 2 cans of beans and pour them into a colander. Rinse the beans and let them drain

 If you do not use beer: Bring 3 dL of water to the boil and make broth with a bouillon cube

 Clean and chop 1 onion

 Clean and chop 2-4 cloves of garlic

 (Clean and chop 2-3 stalks of celery)

 Clean and chop 1-2 chillies

 Put 1 tablespoon of cumin in the mortar and pound it. Add 1 tablespoon of oregano

 Heat up a saute pan or a large pot and add 1 tablespoon of oil

 Saute onion first, then garlic, chilli (and celery)

 Add cumin and oregano and stir briefly

 Add 3 dl of beer (or broth) together with 1 can of peeled tomatoes and 2 tablespoons of tomato concentrate

 The drained beans and 1 teaspoon of (smoke) salt are added and stirred and the lid is put on. Turn down to 1 (out of 9) when it boils and cook for 30 minutes. Remember to set a timer

 Serve with pickled Jalapeno chillies and optional Taco chips

Tip: Instead of taco chips, you can serve wheat tortillas together with salad leaves, diced tomatoes, feta and sour cream. The latter is of course no longer vegan.
Organic tortillas are good buys and heated as directed on the package. Non-organic tortillas typically have quite a few additives

(End)
Wheat tortilla

Tanjine with vegetables - Vegetables with couscous
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 ½ tsp chickpeas

 1 onion

 2-3 cloves of garlic

 200-250 g of mushrooms

 1 eggplant

 1 squash

 4 tomatoes (½ tsp peeled tomatoes)

 (200 g okra or green beans)

 3 carrots

 2 tablespoons soy sauce

 1 teaspoon coriander

 1 teaspoon cardamom

 ½ tsp chilli

 1 teaspoon paprika

 2 dL couscous

Method:
 Open 1 can of chickpeas and pour them into a strainer. Rinse them and freeze half in a plastic bag. (If you flatten the plastic bag before closing, they dry out faster)

Remove the skin from 1 onion and chop it roughly

Remove the skin from 2-3 cloves of garlic and chop them finely

Clean 200-250 g of mushrooms and cut them into slices

Rinse 1 aubergine and cut it into 2×2 cm cubes

Rinse 1 squash and cut it lengthwise. Cut the halves into slices

Dice 4 tomatoes (or open a can of peeled tomatoes and freeze half in a plastic bag)

(Rinse 200 g of okra and cut off the hard stem. If using beans, cut them into 2-3 pieces)

Peel 3 carrots and cut them into sticks (or slices)

Put 1 dL of water and 2 tablespoons of soy sauce in a cup

Pound 1 teaspoon of coriander into the mortar

Break 5-10 cardamom capsules with the pestle of the mortar (gok!) and get approx. 1 teaspoon of black cardamom seeds in the mortar and grind them to powder together with the coriander

Add ½ teaspoon chili and 1 teaspoon paprika to the mortar

Heat up a saute pan or large pot. Add 1-2 tablespoons of oil when the pan is hot and fry the onion until clear

Add the chopped garlic and saute for a few seconds before adding the carrot sticks and sauteing well

fry the spices briefly until the vegetables are covered in spice

Quickly add the diced tomatoes and stir for a while

Add water with soy sauce when it starts to stick to the bottom. Put lid on and turn down to 3 (out of 9)

In another pan, fry the aubergine with a little oil. When they start to turn brown, add them to the onion and tomato

Put a splash of oil in the pan the aubergines were in and fry the squash. Again, they are transferred to the other vegetables when they start to take on a little colour.

Saute the mushrooms separately and then add them to the rest.

Add the whole okra (or green beans) and simmer for 40 minutes. Remember to set a timer for 25 minutes so you remember to put the couscous on top

When the timer beeps, bring 2 dL of water to the boil in a small pot

While the water is boiling, rinse 2 dL of couscous in a strainer and add ¾ teaspoon of salt

When the water boils, add the couscous and salt, stir and turn off the flame. Set a timer for 12 minutes

Set the table while the couscous soaks

When the couscous has soaked for 12 minutes, it should be ready and stir in 1 tablespoon of olive oil

Serve the vegetables with couscous

(End)
Party Pot - African bean pot
(8-10 people) (Start 2 hours before)

(The dish is suitable for freezing, so you might as well make a full portion.
It is filling, so there are at least 8 people if there is bread with it.
Most people love it: This is the recipe I most often requested)


Ingredients:
2.5 dL red lentils

1.5 dL quinoa

1 tsp Baharat (Spice mixture. Recipe below)

2 tbsp oil

2 onions

6 cloves of garlic

2 peppers

1 chili

2 tablespoons peeled tomatoes of 400 g

6 dL broth

2 tablespoons (mixed) beans of 400 g

1 tablespoon of chickpeas per 400 g

1-3 tablespoons chili sauce/Tabasco

1 bay leaf

1 tsp thyme

75 g dried apricots

75 g coriander

(Couscous or bread for)

Spices:

½ teaspoon all-purpose

½ teaspoon cinnamon

½ tsp grated nutmeg

½ tsp cloves

1 teaspoon paprika

1 tsp peppercorns

1 tsp cumin

Method:
Start by making the Baharat spice mix if you don't have any from last:

Baharat

First find all the spices

Grate a nutmeg so that there is ½ teaspoon

Find the mortar and crush

1 tsp peppercorns

½ teaspoon all-purpose

½ tsp cumin

½ tsp cloves

add

1 teaspoon paprika

½ teaspoon cinnamon

½ teaspoon of the grated nutmeg

Mix all the spices well and pour the mixture into a spice jar.
Make a label that says "Baharat" and put it on the glass

Party pot

Put 2.5 dL red lentils and 1.5 dL quinoa in a strainer and rinse them thoroughly

Let the lentils and quinoa drain while you boil 9 dL of water in a pot

When the water boils, add the lentils and quinoa together with 1 teaspoon of Baharat. Do NOT add salt. Stir and cover

Bring the lentils and quinoa to the boil, stir, turn down to 1 (out of 9) and set a timer for 20 minutes.
When the timer rings, switch off the pot

Finely chop 2 onions

Finely chop 6 cloves of garlic

Clean 2 peppers and cut them into cubes

Clean 1 chilli and chop it finely

Open 2 tbsp peeled tomatoes

Open 2 tbsp (mixed) beans and 1 tbsp chickpeas, pour them into a colander (or sieve) and rinse them

Coarsely chop 75 g of dried apricots

Bring 6 dL of water to the boil in the kettle and put 1½ bouillon cubes in a Margrete bowl. Pour the water into the bowl when it boils

Light a burner on 6 (out of 9) and heat up a saute pan or a large pot

When it is hot, add approx. 2 tablespoons of oil and saute the onion until it is soft and slightly transparent

Add the garlic and fry for a minute. (It must not turn brown!)

Put the pepper cubes in the pan and saute them until they are a little soft

Saute the chopped chilli for a minute

And then put the 6 dL of broth from Margreteskålen into the pot

add

2 tbsp peeled tomatoes

The cooked lentils and quinoa

They rinsed the beans and chickpeas

1 bay leaf

1 tsp thyme

75 g coriander

The chopped apricots

1-3 tablespoons chili sauce or Tabasco (Think about how used your guests are to spicy food. It's easier to add extra chili than to take it out)

Stir well while bringing everything to a boil. Put lid on and turn down to 1 (out of 9)

Set a timer for 1 hour, but remember to touch every fifteen minutes. Maybe more often eventually. Add more water if it is growing at the bottom.
Maybe it's good to have an alarm to remember to touch.

When the timer rings, add 1 teaspoon of salt. Taste and add more salt as needed

Serve with bread or couscous and chili sauce.
If necessary, put chopped, strong chilies on the table, so that the guests themselves can sprinkle extra on their portion

(End)
Rice paper wrappers - Salad as a main course
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 2 tablespoons peanut butter

 2 teaspoons (sesame) oil

 4 tablespoons soy sauce

 2 cloves of garlic

 1-2 tablespoons of sugar

 1-2 tablespoons of vinegar

 1-2 tbsp lime juice

 (2 tbsp sesame seeds)


 1 carrot

 100 g bean sprouts

 100 g instant noodles

 150 g mushrooms or 100 g tofu

 4-5 large lettuce leaves

 1 bunch of mint

 (1 bunch coriander)

 12 sheets of rice paper

Method:
Start by making the dipping sauce:

 Put 2 tablespoons of peanut butter in a small saucepan and put it on low heat on the stove (3 out of 9). The dipping sauce should not boil, just heat enough to remove the sharp taste of the garlic. The heating can also be dropped and the ingredients simply stirred together in a serving bowl

 Add 2 teaspoons sesame oil (or a flavor-neutral oil). Stir until the oil is incorporated

 Add 4 tablespoons of soy sauce a little at a time and stir well until the consistency is smooth

 Press 2 cloves of garlic into the pan and stir

 Add 1 tablespoon of sugar

 Add 1 tablespoon of vinegar

 Squeeze half a lime and add 1 tablespoon of lime juice to the pan

 Stir well and add more sugar, vinegar and/or lime juice to taste

 When the sauce steams slightly, put it in a serving bowl and put it on the table with a teaspoon in it

 If using sesame seeds: Heat a pan until it is quite hot and add 2 tablespoons of sesame seeds to the pan. Remove the pan from the heat and stir in the sesame seeds until they have cooled slightly (1-2 minutes). Stir the sesame seeds into the dipping sauce


Now prepare the wrappers:

 Peel a carrot and cut it into 2×2 mm sticks. Place the sticks on a small plate and sprinkle them with 1-2 teaspoons of sugar to draw out the water and make them pliable

 Weigh out 100 g of bean sprouts and put them in a small bowl

 Bring 3 cm of water to the boil in a small pot with a lid and add 100 g of instant noodles when the water boils. Let them cook for 4-5 minutes as indicated on the package. Remember to set a timer. Pour the water from the noodles into the bowl with bean sprouts when the timer rings and leave the noodles in the pan with the lid on.

 After 1 minute, the bean sprouts are scalded enough to kill any bacteria that can occasionally hide in bean sprouts, and the water is poured from the bean sprouts

 Clean 150 g of mushrooms and cut them into fairly thin slices (~3 mm). (If tofu is used, it is good to let it soak for a few hours in 3 tablespoons of soy sauce and 1 tablespoon of vinegar or lime juice. Cut the tofu into sticks that are 5×5 mm in cross section)

 Fry the mushrooms on a dry pan until the moisture is gone. (If using tofu, roast it in 1-2 tablespoons (sesame) oil)

 Peel the outermost 4-5 large leaves from a head of lettuce and rinse the leaves. Cut them into strips and set aside

 Pick the 12-14 largest leaves of the mint and rinse them. Set them aside.

 If you like coriander, rinse a bundle of coriander carefully and place the stems in a loose pile. You have to get used to the taste of coriander, but it tastes just as good once you get used to it as it tastes strange the first time you taste it :-)

 Finally, assemble the wrappers by soaking each rice paper wrapper in water for a few seconds (Hold the water in a pie dish. Add a splash of boiling water so it is warm) and then put one twelfth of each part of the filling on one half of the soaked wrapper. Place three mint leaves on the other half and then pull/fold the wrapper around the salad first and then over the mint leaves.

In this video on assembling wrappers , shrimp are used instead of mint leaves, but the principle is the same. If you use prawns, you can leave out the mushrooms/tofu and add the mint leaves together with the salad - but then it's not vegan anymore :-)

 Set the table and serve the wrappers with the dipping sauce.
The wrappers are easiest to eat with your fingers, and are therefore suitable for a walk in the woods. (One should NOT use shrimp if the wrappers are not eaten immediately. Avoid shrimp and other perishable ingredients on a forest trip)

Tip: You can use ready-made Thai chilli sauce as a dip or replace the peanut butter and garlic with a finely chopped chilli and chilli powder to taste.
There are many other dips that can be found by searching for "Vietnamese wrappers dip".
It is good to have several types of dip at the same time

(End)
Near-vegan

What is near-vegan?
Near-vegan are recipes that have one or two dairy products that can be replaced by alternatives - or completely omitted - without it significantly detracting from the dish.

Homemade pasta can be made without eggs. Then replace each egg with ½ dL of water.

Boiled corn on the cob
(4 people) (Start ½ hour before)

Ingredients:
 4-6 corn on the cob (Corn on the cob should feel "heavy" when weighed in the hand)

 butter (analogue)

 flake salt

Method:
 Put water in a large pot and bring it to the boil while the corn cobs are prepared

 Remove the bracts from the cobs and remove the thin green threads

 When the water boils, add the corn cobs and cook for 7 minutes from the time the water boils again. Remember to set a timer.
If the corn cobs are too big for the pan, they are easy to break in the middle if you take a firm hold of the whole cob with both hands and quickly break in the middle

 Set the table with napkins instead of cutlery

 Serve with flaked salt and butter (analogue) or sesame oil and sesame seeds

(End)
Whole artichokes
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 4 artichokes

 2-4 tbsp olive oil

 2 cloves of garlic

 butter (analogue)

 flake salt

Method:
 Cut the stems off the artichokes

 Put the artichokes in a large pot and pour water over them until they start to float. Remove the artichokes and bring the water to the boil with the lid on

 When the water boils, add the artichokes, cover and set a timer for 35 minutes

 Put 2 tablespoons of olive oil in a cup and press 2 cloves of garlic into the oil

 Set the table with flaked salt, butter (analogue) and garlic dressing. You need napkins, a knife and fork and a teaspoon to eat the artichokes with. Place a large bowl or pot on the table for discarded leaves. Artichokes fill up more after being eaten!

 When the timer rings, you carefully pull a leaf from one of the artichokes. If the blade comes off easily, they are done. Otherwise, they must have 5-15 minutes more. Check every 5 minutes if the leaves come off easily. Remember to set a timer for each time

 Drain the water and serve the artichokes

 You eat the artichokes by pulling off leaves with your fingers, dipping the bottom of the leaves in garlic dressing or butter (analogue) or salt and scraping the edible part of the leaves with your teeth. The rest of the leaf is placed in the bowl in the middle of the table

 When all the outer leaves have been removed and the inner leaves are too small, the "beard" in the middle must be removed with a teaspoon. The beard is discarded and the bottom is drizzled with dressing and salt or butter (analogue)

 The base is eaten with a knife and fork. Artichokes are incredibly filling, so one large artichoke is usually enough per person

 Half an hour to a full hour after eating artichokes, your sense of taste changes slightly, so that everything tastes sweeter. It is not dangerous and will pass, but perhaps you should not serve dessert right after artichokes

(End)
Chestnuts - baked with butter (analogue)
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 600-800 g real chestnuts (8-12 per person)

 1 kg cheap salt

 Flake salt

 butter (analogue)

 (1 bottle of red wine)

Method:
 Turn on the oven at 200°. Remember to take the plates out

 Wash the chestnuts and cut a cross in the top of each chestnut so they don't "pop" in the oven. It is important!
Take care that the knife does not slip when you cross-cut the chestnuts. They are quite tough

 Pour 1 kg of cheap coarse salt into the bottom of a pie dish and place the chestnuts in the salt with the top upwards so that they are almost covered with salt

 Put the dish in the oven when it is hot and set the timer for 35 minutes. If the chestnuts are very large, they may need up to 10 minutes more

 Set the table and place a large bowl for the shells on the table

 The outside of the chestnuts must be removed with the fingers at the table while they are hot, and the chestnuts are eaten with butter (analogue) and salt.
If you like red wine, it goes incredibly well with chestnuts

True chestnuts have finer and denser spines than horse chestnuts. They only grow in a few places in Denmark, so you usually buy real chestnuts in the shops around October

(End)
Pizza with potato slices and sage
(4 people) (Start 1.5 hours before)

Ingredients:
 1¼ dl water

 15 g of yeast

 250 g wheat flour

 2 tablespoons (olive) oil

 ½ tsp salt

 350 g potatoes

 2 tbsp olive oil

 2 tablespoons of sage

 2 cloves of garlic

 (50 g Parmesan cheese (or Western cheese))

Method:
Put 1¼ dL of water in a Margrethe bowl

Dissolve 15 g of yeast (1/3 package) in the water

Weigh out 250 g of wheat flour and put most of it in the bowl

Put 2 tablespoons of oil and 1 teaspoon of salt in the bowl

 Knead the dough until it leaves the table. You may need more flour.

Leave the dough to rise with a lid or tea towel over it

Find a Margrethe bowl and add 3 tablespoons of olive oil

Press 2 cloves of garlic into the oil

Add 2 tablespoons of sage to the oil and stir

Peel the potatoes and cut them into very thin slices with the knife on the side of a grater. Or with a sharp knife

Put the potato slices in the Margrethe bowl and turn them around until they are all covered with oil and sage and garlic

Grate 50 g Parmesan or Western cheese. (The cheese can be left out or replaced by a vegan product. Cheese gives a richer taste, but is not strictly necessary here, since it is not a "classic" pizza after all. The reason for leaving out the cheese is that the potatoes will be more crispy. Is (for crispy potatoes, the cheese can be left out or added before the potatoes. Maybe it's an idea to drizzle with extra oil if you don't use cheese)

Turn on the oven at 200° and take out the plates. Put baking paper on two of them

Roll out half of the dough very thinly and place it on the baking paper

Spread the potato slices over the dough in a single layer

When the oven is hot, bake the pizza for 10-14 minutes until the potatoes have taken on a slight colour. (15-20 minutes if no cheese is used or the cheese is under the potatoes). Remember to set a timer

(Take the pizza out and place it on top of the stove. Sprinkle with the grated parmesan and put the pizza back in the oven for 5-10 minutes until the cheese has taken color)

Serve with salt and freshly ground pepper

(End)
Potato salad with beans (and shrimp)
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 ¾-1 kg (boiled) potatoes

 1 dL olive oil

 3-4 tablespoons lime or lemon juice

 1 small red onion or 1 spring onion

 4 tablespoons fresh mint

 3 tablespoons fresh coriander

 1 teaspoon of salt

 ½ teaspoon of sugar

 pepper

 (1-200 g prawns)

 75 g sun-dried tomatoes in oil

 1 can (400 g) of white beans

 (sprigs of mint for decoration)

Method:
 (Take the prawns out of the freezer and put the bag in lukewarm water - or better: follow the thawing instructions on the bag)

Peel the potatoes and put them in water that just covers them and bring them to the boil

When the water boils, turn down to 3 (out of 9)

Set the timer for 15-17 minutes, depending on how big the potatoes are

When the timer rings, poke a skewer or fork into the potatoes. They should be tender, but not so much that they start to crumble and cook out.

Drain the water and let them cool a little before cutting them into little finger-thick slices

In a Margrethe bowl, add 1 dL of olive oil and 2 tablespoons of lime or lemon juice

Finely chop a small red onion or a spring onion and add 4 tablespoons of onion to the bowl

Finely chop the mint and coriander. There must be approx. 4 tablespoons of mint and 3 tablespoons of coriander. Put both parts in the bowl

Add 1 tsp salt, ½ tsp sugar and pepper to the bowl and beat well with a whisk or fork

Taste if you need more lime or lemon juice. You can add up to 4 tablespoons depending on taste and how sour the citrus fruits are

Cut approx. 75 g sun-dried tomatoes in strips

 Open the can of beans and rinse them in a colander. If the beans are very large (Lima beans/butter beans) they may need to be cut

Slice the potatoes now if not already done

 (Strain the water from the thawed prawns and lightly squeeze the prawns so that the last wetness drains off)

 (Heat a saute pan or a large pot and add 4 tablespoons of dressing. Saute the prawns for a few minutes and remove them from the pan and place them on a plate)

Put the rest of the dressing in the pan and heat it through briefly. Turn down to 4 out of 9

Add the potato slices and stir until all the potatoes are covered. If the potatoes have been in the fridge, warm them through without scorching

Add sun-dried tomatoes and beans and heat through

 (Sprinkle the prawns on top and serve)

 (Garnish if necessary with sprigs of mint)

(End)
Pasta with peppers and lemon-parsley
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 3 peppers (preferably in different colors)

 1 clove of garlic

 ½ teaspoon of sugar

 1 tablespoon white wine vinegar

 ½ tsp peeled tomatoes (Put the rest of the can in a plastic bag and freeze it)

 ¾ teaspoon salt

 30 g butter (⅓ dL olive oil)

 1 teaspoon of oregano

 2-3 sprigs of parsley

 Grate the rind of ⅓ organic lemon

 (⅙ tsp cumin)

 500 g pasta (possibly homemade, recipe below)

Method:
 Start by making pasta dough (recipe below) or weigh out 500 g of pasta

 Rinse and clean 3 peppers. Cut them into cubes about the size of a thumb nail

 Remove the skin from 1 clove of garlic and chop it finely

 Heat up a saute pan or a large pot and add 1 tablespoon of oil

 Fry the pepper cubes

 Add the garlic at the end and stir for half a minute

 Add ½ teaspoon of sugar and stir briefly before

 1 tablespoon of white wine vinegar is added

 Add ½ can of peeled tomatoes and stir well

 Add ¾ teaspoon of salt, stir and cover. Turn down to 1 (out of 9) and cook for 20 minutes. Remember to set a timer. Switch off when the timer rings
(If necessary, put the plates on the lid so they can get warm.)

 Put 30 g of butter on a saucer so that it can soften a little (or put ⅓ dL of olive oil in a cup)

 Sprinkle 1 teaspoon of oregano over the butter

 Finely chop 2-3 sprigs of parsley

 Grate the zest of ⅓ lemon

 Crush ⅙ teaspoon cumin in the mortar

 Put parsley, lemon zest and ground cumin on top of the butter (or down to the olive oil in the cup) and stir it all together with a fork

 Now is the time to add water and roll out the pasta, if you make the pasta yourself

 Set the table, but wait with the plates until the food is served if you heat them on the lid of the pasta pot

 Cook the pasta and pour it into a colander.

 Put the pot back on the extinguished flame and add the spice mixture. If butter is used, wait until it has melted. The pasta is then poured back into the pan and turned around so that it is covered with parsley and lemon zest

 Serve the pasta with the pepper sauce. You can possibly mix it all together in a pot before serving

(End)
Homemade pasta

Pasta with tomato and walnuts
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 onion

 1 carrot

 1-2 stalks of celery

 (2 tablespoons chopped parsley)

 1 teaspoon red wine vinegar (balsamic)

 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

 ½-1 tsp salt

 0.6 dL white wine (or broth)

 90 g walnuts (almonds don't taste nearly as good here)

 35 g grated Parmesan or Western cheese

 400 g pasta (or a portion of homemade pasta)

Method:
 Measure out 0.6 dL of white wine or broth and add 1 teaspoon of red wine vinegar

 Open 1 can of peeled tomatoes

 Chop 1 onion

 Chop 1-2 stalks of celery

 Peel and grate 1 carrot (or chop it finely)

 Heat up a saute pan or a large pot and add 1 tablespoon of oil

 Saute the onion and, a little later, the celeriac without it taking on colour

 Add the carrot and stir

 Add the wine (/bouillon) and vinegar mixture and stir

 Add the peeled tomatoes and stir

 (Add 2 tbsp chopped parsley if you have and stir)

 Season with salt (approx. ½ teaspoon) and stir

 Let the sauce boil for approx. half an hour while the final preparations are made and the table is set

 Chop 90 g walnuts and grate 35 g cheese

 Heat a small pan and add the walnuts. Stir and remove the walnuts. Stir them occasionally while they cool

 Cook the pasta using the saving method for the time indicated on the bag + 1-2 minutes

 Stir in the walnuts and stir. Serve with pasta and grated cheese

(End)
Vegetarian

Pasta with eggs and cream
(4 people) (Start ½ hour before)

Ingredients:
 400 g pasta (possibly homemade, recipe below)

 3 eggs

 40 g grated Parmesan or Western cheese

 2 ½ dL cream

Method:
 Cook the pasta according to the saving method. Remember to heat the plates on the lid

 While the pasta is cooking, beat 3 eggs in a Margrethe bowl

 Add 40 g of grated cheese

 Put 2 ½ dL of cream in the bowl and whisk it all around

 When the pasta is done, drain it in a colander and return it to the pan

 Egg mixture is poured in and stirred over full heat for just under 1 minute until the egg is slightly set

 Serve immediately on warmed plates with freshly ground pepper

Note: The dish is delicious and easy, but quite fat. It should not be eaten every day…

(End)
Homemade pasta

Cauliflower platter
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 1 cauliflower

 4 tomatoes

 4 eggs

 1 L creme fraiche or ymer

 salt

 pepper

Method:
Grease an ovenproof dish and turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to remove the plates)

Divide the cauliflower into small florets

Cut each of the 4 tomatoes into 6 boats

Crack 4 eggs into a Margrethe bowl and whisk them together

Add 1 L of creme fraiche or ymer or a mixture and stir well

Add 1 teaspoon of salt and ½ teaspoon of pepper and stir

Stir the cauliflower and tomatoes into the egg mixture and pour it all into the ovenproof dish

Bake in the middle of the oven at 200° (Remember to take out the plates when you turn it on) for 30-40 minutes until it has acquired a little color here and there. Remember to set the timer

Served with flutes and/or green salad

(End)
Green salad

Scrambled eggs with vegetables 1 (Kaliandra)
(2-3 people) (Start ¾ hour before)

Ingredients:
 1 onion

 6-7 cherry tomatoes (or 2 medium tomatoes)

 1 chili

 1 bunch coriander or parsley

 125 g feta

 2 tbsp tomato concentrate

 5(-8) eggs

 1-2 tbsp olive oil

Method:
 Start by setting the table

 Finely chop 1 onion

 Cut 6-7 cherry tomatoes and squeeze out the seeds in the bin. Chop them coarsely

 Clean and finely chop 1 chilli

 Rinse a bunch of coriander (or parsley), shake dry and chop finely

 Cut 125 g of feta into cubes

 Crack 5(-8) eggs into a Margrethe bowl and beat them together well with a whisk or a fork

 Heat up a frying pan and add 1-2 tablespoons of olive oil

 Saute onion first and then chilli until soft

 Put in the cherry tomatoes and fry them for a few minutes. Turn down to 4 (out of 9)

 Come approx. Add 2 tablespoons of tomato concentrate and the chopped coriander and stir well. Ask people to start sitting at the table

 Add the eggs and do not stir. If the eggs harden too quickly, move the pan to a cold burner

 After half a minute, when the lower part of the egg mixture has started to harden, push the hardened egg over to one side of the pan. Let the pan stand again, and then again push the set egg mixture over to the side of the pan. Repeat until all the egg is almost set but still moist

 Stir in the feta cubes and serve immediately. the eggs continue to cook on the hot pan, so people should preferably start sitting at the table when the eggs are poured.

 Serve with sweet chili sauce

Tip: You get a finer, fluffier texture if you stir constantly. Then the heat must be very low. It is a matter of taste how you like the texture. I personally find the fluffy texture too blistering

Tip: You can make the scrambled eggs in a separate pan and then stir in the tomato mixture and feta at the end. It looks a little nicer

(End)
Scrambled eggs with vegetables 2 (Akoori)
(2-3 people) (Start ¾ hour before)

Ingredients:
 1-2 red onions

 6-7 cherry tomatoes (or 2 medium tomatoes)

 2-3 chillies

 2-3 cm fresh ginger

 2-3 cm fresh turmeric or ½ tsp turmeric powder

 ½ bunch coriander or parsley

 5(-8) eggs

 4 tablespoons of milk

 ¾ teaspoon salt

 ¼ teaspoon freshly ground pepper

 ½ tsp cumin

 1-2 tablespoons (coconut) oil

Method:
 Start by setting the table

 Finely chop 1-2 red onions

 Cut 6-7 cherry tomatoes and squeeze out the seeds in the bin. Chop them coarsely

 Clean and finely chop 2-3 chillies

 Peel 2-3 cm of ginger and grate it finely

 Peel 2-3 cm of turmeric root and chop it finely (Consider using gloves) Or measure out ½ teaspoon of turmeric powder

 Rinse half a bunch of coriander (or parsley), shake dry and chop finely

 Crack 5(-8) eggs into a Margrethe bowl and beat them together well with a whisk or a fork

 Add 4 tablespoons of milk to the eggs

 Add ¾ teaspoon salt and ¼ teaspoon freshly ground pepper

 Pound ½ teaspoon of cumin into the mortar, add it to the egg mixture and stir well

 Heat up a frying pan and add 1-2 tablespoons of (coconut) oil

 First, fry the red onion until it is soft

 Add the chilli and ginger and let it sizzle for a moment

 Put in the cherry tomatoes and fry them for a few minutes. Turn down to 4 (out of 9)

 Add the chopped coriander and stir well. Ask people to start sitting at the table

 Add the egg mixture, but do not stir. If the eggs harden too quickly, move the pan to a cold burner

 After half a minute, when the lower part of the egg mixture has started to harden, push the hardened egg over to one side of the pan. Let the pan stand again, and then again push the set egg mixture over to the side of the pan. Repeat until all the egg is almost set but still moist

 Serve immediately. the eggs continue to cook on the hot pan, so people should preferably start sitting at the table when the eggs are poured.

 Serve with sweet chili sauce and perhaps chappaties (See under Accessories) or instant noodles

Tip: You get a finer, fluffier texture if you stir constantly. Then the heat must be very low. It is a matter of taste how you like the texture. I personally find the fluffy texture too blistering

Tip: You can saute many kinds of vegetables and mushrooms and season them as you like to vary these two recipes for scrambled eggs. Peppers and spinach are suitable here, cabbage perhaps not so much

(End)
Fried rice
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 2½ dL basmati rice (Parboiled rice is not good for this recipe. Jasmine rice works)

 3¾ dL water

 1 teaspoon of salt

 3 tbsp oil

 1 chilli

 1 red onion

 2 tablespoons fish sauce

 1 egg

 1 tablespoon parsley or coriander

 1 tablespoon soy sauce

 1 teaspoon brown sugar

Method:
 If you have rice left over (not parboiled), they can be used instead of cooking new ones. Then the first points are skipped

 Bring 3¾ dL to a boil in a small saucepan

 Measure out 2½ dL of rice and put them in a strainer. Rinse the rice until the water is clear

 Put 1 teaspoon of salt on top of the rice

 When the water boils, turn the rice into the water, stir it around and turn it down to 1 (out of 9)

 Set the timer for 12 minutes and place 4 plates on the lid if necessary to heat them. Cold fried rice is not as delicious as hot

 When the timer rings, turn off the flame and leave the rice covered for at least 12 more minutes. Remember the minute

 Stir the rice so that it is loose and not lumpy and let it cool without the lid. They must be completely dry

 Clean 1 chilli and chop it finely

 Remove the skin from 1 red onion and cut it into slices. Halve the slices

 Chop 1 tablespoon of parsley or coriander and put it in a cup

 Put 1 tablespoon of soy sauce in the cup

 Add 1 teaspoon of brown sugar to the cup and stir

 Take a new cup and beat 1 egg into the cup. Beat it well with a fork

 Heat up a saute pan or a large pot and add 3 tablespoons of oil

 Add the chopped chilli and the red onions and fry them briefly (about 1 minute)

 Add 2 tablespoons of fish sauce and stir

 Add the beaten egg and stir while it hardens into fluffy little pieces (½-1 minute). It should not turn brown

 Add rice and stir well for approx. 1 minute

 Add the soy sauce, sugar and parsley mixture and stir well

 Serve immediately, possibly with oyster sauce or sweet chilli sauce from a bottle

Tip: Peppers in strips and sliced ​​mushrooms can be added together with the chilli and/or prawns together with the rice

(End)
Gratinated vegetables
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 ½ kg Brussels sprouts (or fennel or leeks or ...)

 25-30 g butter

 3 tablespoons of flour

 3 dL milk or boiling water from the vegetables

 ½ tbsp bouillon powder

 (&hafl; tsp grated nutmeg)

 75 g grated cheese

Method:
 Grease an ovenproof dish

 Clean the vegetables and cut them into suitable pieces. Brussels sprouts are usually fine as they are. Halve the fennel

 Put 1 L of water into a small pot and bring it to the boil

 Add the vegetables and cook for 7 minutes. Turn down to 3 (out of 9) when they boil again. Remember to set a timer

 Turn on the oven at 200°C. Remember to take the plates out

 Pour the water from the vegetables (into a bowl if you don't use milk) and put the vegetables in the greased dish

 Now make a bechamel sauce: Measure out 3 dL of milk (or boiling water from the vegetables. It's just as good)

 Take a saucepan. Turn up to 9 (out of 9) and melt 25 g of butter in a small pan.

 When the butter is almost melted, turn down to 7 (out of 9). Then add 3 tablespoons of flour and stir well until there is no more dry flour

 Add a splash of milk, stir well, add a splash of milk and continue until you have used all the liquid.

 Turn down to 3 (out of 9) when the sauce boils and cook the sauce through for 2 minutes , stirring

 Season with salt or bouillon (approx. ½ bouillon cube) (and ½ teaspoon grated nutmeg)

 Pour the bechamel sauce over the vegetables so they are covered

 Sprinkle the 75 g of grated cheese evenly over the dish

 Place the dish in the oven for 20 minutes until the surface has some brown spots. Remember to set a timer

Tip: Serve with grissini or possibly with baked sesame potatoes

(End)
Creamed potatoes with eggs
(4 people) (Start 1¾ hours before)

Ingredients:
1 kg of potatoes

2 eggs

2 dL milk

1½ dL cream

100 g of cheese

½ tsp nutmeg

(1 clove of garlic)

1 teaspoon of salt

(pepper)

Method:
Grease an ovenproof dish

Find a pot and fill it with water

Peel the potatoes and add them to the pan as they are done

Take a Margrethe bowl and beat two eggs into the bowl. Wash your fingers, as there may be salmonella on eggs

Add 2 dL of milk to the eggs

And 1½ dL cream. Stir well with a fork or whisk

Grate a nutmeg until there is ½ teaspoon of grated nutmeg and stir it into the bowl

Grate 100 g of cheese and put half of the cheese into the egg mixture

(Press 1 clove of garlic into the egg mixture)

Add 1 teaspoon salt and, if desired, pepper. Stir well

Turn on the oven at 220°. Remember to take the plates out

Find a clean tea towel and place it on the table next to a cutting board

Cut the potatoes into fairly thin slices and place them on the tea towel as you go. Dry the slices once in a while and transfer them to the dish.
If you can bear it, it will look nice to lay the potato slices in neat rows so that they lie half on top of each other in the rows. It also helps to evenly space all potato slices so they bake evenly.
There may well be several layers of potato slice rows

Pour the egg mixture over the potato slices so they are completely covered

Sprinkle with the rest of the cheese, possibly put 5-10 small blobs of butter on top and put the potato dish in the middle of the oven. Set a timer for 1 hour

Serve with salad or butter-steamed scallions (Can be found under Accessories)

(End)
Green salad

Plöf - carrots and leeks with cottage cheese and eggs
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 dL breadcrumbs

 2 dL milk

 1 onion

 3-4 leeks

 2-3 carrots

 3 tbsp oil

 1 bunch parsley

 400 g cottage cheese

 2 eggs

 1 teaspoon of oregano

 ¾ teaspoon salt

 (flutes)

Method:
 Start by putting 1 dL of breadcrumbs in a Margrethe bowl and add 2 dL of milk while stirring. Let it stand and bleed out

 Find an ovenproof dish and grease it well. Sprinkle the sides with breadcrumbs

 Finely chop 1 onion

 Clean 3-4 leeks and cut them into thin strips. Cut the strips into pieces of approximately 5 cm

 Peel and grate 2-3 carrots

 Take the plates out of the oven and set it to 200°

 Heat a pan and add 3 tablespoons of oil. Saute onions first, then leeks and finally the grated carrots.

 Take the vegetables off the heat and let them cool slightly while you wash and chop a small bunch of parsley

 Add the parsley to the soaked rasp and stir

 Add the parsley and grated cheese to the vegetables and stir until the grated cheese is distributed

 Add 400 g cottage cheese and stir well

 Crack two eggs into the bowl and mix well

 Finish by stirring in 1 teaspoon of oregano and ¾ teaspoon of salt

 Pour the vegetable mass into the greased ovenproof dish and put it in the oven for 45-50 minutes. If the dish is deep, it may need to be a little longer so that it is stiffened in the middle

 Set the table and serve with flutes or Emigrant Bread and/or salad

(End)
Emigrant Bread

Green salad

Eggplant pizza
(4 people) (Start 1.5 hours before)

Ingredients:
 2 dL water

 15 g of yeast

 350 g wheat flour

 2 tbsp olive oil

 1 teaspoon of salt

 1-2 aubergines

 olive oil

 1 large chopped onion

 2-3 cloves of garlic

 (2-3 stalks of celery and/or)

 (2-3 carrots and/or )

 (250 g mushrooms)

 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

 2 bay leaves

 2 tablespoons tomato puree

 125 g mozzarella

Method:
 Put 2 dL of water in a Margrethe bowl

 Dissolve 15 g of yeast (1/3 package) in the water

 Put most of the 350 g of wheat flour in the bowl, but keep a little back, as it is easier to add more flour than more water

 Put 2 tablespoons of oil and 1 teaspoon of salt in the bowl

 Knead the dough until it leaves the table. It probably needs more flour.

 Leave the dough to rise with a lid or tea towel over it

 Cut the aubergine into thin slices (7-10 mm)

 Heat 5-6 mm of oil in a frying pan

 Fry the aubergine slices light brown and turn them over (perhaps you have to fry in several batches)
When both sides are nicely browned, place the slices on kitchen paper to drain on a plate
(You can also bake the aubergine slices in the oven for 30-40 minutes at 200°.
They should then brush with oil on both sides. Put them in a cold oven and check the color after 30 min. They must not turn black, at most have some small black edges.)

 Open a can of peeled tomatoes

 Put 2 tablespoons of tomato paste on top of the can so that it is ready to be poured

 Clean and chop 1 onion

 Clean and chop 2-3 cloves of garlic

 (Clean and chop 2-3 stalks of celery)

 (Clean and chop 250 g mushrooms)

 Put 2 tablespoons of oil in a saute pan or a large pot and fry the vegetables in the order they are mentioned

 Add 1 teaspoon of sugar and stir briefly

 Add the tomato mixture and stir well again

 When it boils, turn down to 1 (out of 9) and add ¾ teaspoon of salt

 Add 1-2 bay leaves and stir

 Let the tomato mixture simmer while the rest is prepared. Stir occasionally so it doesn't burn

 Turn on the oven at 230° (Remember to remove the plates)

 Cut the mozzarella into thin slices and find the oregano and lemon

 Roll out the dough into one or two round bottoms

 Rub flour onto a baking sheet and place the well-floured base on the sheet

 Spread the tomato sauce over the base

 Sprinkle with oregano and drizzle with lemon juice

 Place the aubergine slices on the pizza

 Spread the mozzarella slices over the aubergine slices

 Bake the pizza for 12-15 minutes and serve

 (You can squeeze garlic in oil to drizzle on at the table. If you think raw garlic is too scratchy, the oil can be heated in a pan until the garlic just starts to sizzle)

Tip: Instead of aubergine slices, you can add 1 can of (smoked) mussels.
Or a can of sliced ​​artichoke hearts.
You can also cut mushrooms into slices and put them on. The mushrooms give off a lot of moisture, so the pizza becomes somewhat moist from raw mushrooms.
If you don't like it, you can fry them on a dry pan first

(End)
Argentinian Spinach Pie
(4 people) (Start 1½-2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 150 g flour

 1 teaspoon baking powder

 1 teaspoon of sugar

 ½ tsp salt

 1 egg

 2 tbsp oil

 ½ dL milk


 200 g of spinach

 1 onion

 2 tbsp oil

 1 tablespoon of flour

 ½ tsp salt

 ½ tsp grated nutmeg

 2 dL milk

 2 eggs

 50 g North Sea cheese

Method:
 Put 150 g of flour in a Margrethe bowl

 Add 1 teaspoon baking powder and

 1 teaspoon of sugar and

 ½ tsp salt

 Stir well and add 1 egg and

 2 tbsp oil and

 2 dL milk

 Stir well until the dough just comes together. Put the dough in the fridge

 Grease a pie dish and set it aside

 If fresh spinach is used, first rinse it in a colander and shake off most of the water. Then put the spinach in a pan and put it on the stove and turn up to 4 (out of 9). Stir occasionally while the spinach dries up/collapses. You can start on the next step in the meantime. Especially if you set a timer so you remember to touch approx. every 5 minutes

 Take the plates out of the oven and set it to 200°

 Measure out 2 dL of milk

 Find 1 tablespoon of flour (put it in a small glass if necessary)

 Grate 50 g Western cheese

 Finely chop 1 onion

 Heat a pan and add 2 tablespoons of oil

 Saute the onion and then add 1 tablespoon of flour

 Add the milk while stirring and take the pan off the heat

 Add ½ teaspoon of grated nutmeg and

 beat in 2 eggs

 Drain the water from the spinach and, if necessary, chop it on a large chopping board. Then add the spinach to the onion in the pan

 Roll out the dough and put it in the pie dish

 Pour the filling into the pie dish and sprinkle with grated cheese

 Put the pie in the middle of the oven for 30 minutes. Remember to set a timer

Serve with a salad and soy sauce.

There is no butter in the dough, so this pie is healthier than regular pies. For guests and parties, I will probably use a shortcrust pastry as a base, but for everyday use this dough is perfectly fine

(End)
Green salad

Onion pie
(4 people) (Start 2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 250 g flour

 ½ tsp salt

 125 g cold butter

 0.75 dL cold water

 750 g onion

 35 g of butter

 50 g grated cheese

 1 dL cream or creme fraiche

 2 eggs

 1 tsp flour

 salt, pepper

Method:
Start with the shortcrust pastry:

 Put 250 g of flour in a Margrethe bowl.

 Add ½ teaspoon of salt

Cut 125 g of cold butter into small cubes and put them in the bowl for the flour.

Use a hand mixer to mix the butter and flour together. Start on low speed so that flour doesn't splatter all over the place. Continue until the consistency is smooth (like breadcrumbs.)

If you don't have a mixer, you can use a knife to chop the butter into the flour. It is important not to warm the dough with your fingers, as it will then become more difficult to work with.

Add 0.75 dL of cold water while stirring. The dough should only just come together. Press it together lightly with your hands, but finally not too much.

Put the dough in the fridge for at least half an hour while you make the rest.

Peel the onions and cut them into thin slices. Preferably as thin as possible.

Melt the butter and add the onions. The butter should not brown, and neither should the onions!

Turn down to 3-4 out of 9 and set a timer for 10 minutes. Stir occasionally until the clock chimes.

Stir in 3/4 teaspoon salt and a little pepper. Stir well, put the lid on and turn the flame all the way down (1 or a little less.)

Set the timer for 15 minutes and steam the onions until the timer rings. Stir occasionally. The onions must not brown or stick to the bottom of the pan. If this happens, add 1-2 tablespoons of water and stir well.

Remove the lid and set the timer for 10 minutes. Stir occasionally while the last moisture evaporates.

Take the pan off the heat and let it stand while you grease a pie dish with butter.

Turn on the oven at 190° (Remember to remove the plates)

Put flour on the table and a rolling pin and roll out the shortcrust pastry to approx. 1-1½ cm thickness. It doesn't matter that the edge is cracked at this point.

Fold the dough so that the edges are approx. a third over the dough from all sides and again roll out the dough quite thick. Fold again and then roll out the dough into a circle. It should now be elastic and smooth if you haven't warmed it with your fingers. Otherwise, repeat the folding and unfolding once more.

Line the pie tin with dough and cut the edge ½-1 cm above the edge of the dish. Prick the pie base with a fork.

If you want a less sticky base, pre-bake the base for 10-15 minutes at 190° C, but this is not necessary.

Stir 2 eggs and 1 dL of cream or creme fraiche together and stir 1 teaspoon of flour into the onions. Stir the egg mixture into the onions.

Stir in the grated cheese (50-100 g) and spread the filling in the pie base. Smooth the surface with a fork.

You can put a dough lid on if there is dough left over. If there is only a little dough left, you can put strips of dough criss-cross for decoration. The edge of the strips may cut with a small file to give a nice wavy edge. It is not necessary to put lids or strips on.

Bake the pie for 25-30 minutes at 190° C until it is firm and the surface has taken on a bit of colour.

Serve the pie warm or warm with soy sauce and perhaps a salad.

(End)
Chanterelle Souffle
(4 people) (Start 1¾ hours before)

Ingredients:
 ~¾ dL breadcrumbs

 75-150 g chanterelles

 50-75 g instant noodles

 50 g of butter

 40 g (~¾ dL) flour

 3 dL milk

 ½ stock cube

 5 eggs

Method:
 Start by greasing a tall ovenproof dish, preferably a cylinder dish for souffle

 Add ¾ dL of breadcrumbs and move the bowl around until the inside is covered with breadcrumbs. The last crumb is thrown away. Set the bowl aside

 If you have found the chanterelles yourself, they must be cleaned and rinsed of soil and perhaps cut into smaller pieces.

 Heat a pan and add the chanterelles. If you use frozen chanterelles from the supermarket, do not thaw them first

 Slowly fry the chanterelles on 5 (out of 9) until they are fried and have some brown spots and set them aside on a cold flame

 Put enough water in a small pot to cover 50-75g of instant noodles and bring to the boil. Add the instant noodles, turn down to 1 (out of 9) and cook for 4-5 minutes until tender. Remember to set a timer

 Drain the water from the instant noodles and set them aside on a cold stove

 Now make a thick bechamel sauce: Melt 50 g of butter in a small saucepan. Turn up 9 (out of 9)

 When the butter has melted, turn down to 7 (out of 9) and add 40 g of flour and stir well until there is no more dry flour

 Add a splash of milk, stir well, add a splash of milk and continue until you have a thick smooth sauce. It must be just so liquid that it can cook without burning

 Turn down to 3 (out of 9) when the sauce boils and cook the sauce through for 2 minutes, stirring

 Season to taste with salt or bouillon (approx. ½ bouillon cube)

 Add chanterelles and instant noodles and stir well until everything is covered in sauce. Put the lid on and set the pan aside on a cold burner

 Find a Margrethe bowl and two cups.
Divide the eggs using one cup and put the whites in the Margrethe bowl and the yolks in the other cup. Keep the last yolk and stir 4 of the yolks into the bechamel sauce. The single yolk can be stored in the fridge in a cup with plastic wrap over it to brush bread or buns with

 Take the plates out of the oven, except for one on the bottom rack, and turn the oven on to 190°

 Add a pinch of fine salt to the egg whites in the Margrethe bowl and whip them stiff (the salt makes them stiffer).
They should not be whipped too stiff, just to the peaks, no sinks will remain immediately when you switch off the beater and lift it up from the whites

 Carefully stir half of the whites into the bechamel sauce until they are evenly distributed and then carefully fold in the rest of the whites.
They should be well distributed, but not so much that all the air has been knocked out of them.
Better some egg white streaks than no air

 Carefully pour the souffle mass into the cylindrical bowl with the grater and bake the souffle for 40-50 minutes on the lower rack. Remember to set a timer.
Avoid opening the oven after half an hour and bumping the souffle, as it may collapse. Carefully insert a skewer or a narrow knife into the center of the souffle to see if it is done. If there is no dough on the grill spit when it is pulled out, the souffle is ready (or overbaked...)

 Serve with Emigrant Bread or flutes and/or salad. Possibly soy sauce.
Do not put it on the table before people have sat down, as it will slowly collapse as the temperature in the air bubbles drops

Tips: You can make a souffle with 75-150 g of anything, as long as it is quite dry and strong tasting.

If the mold fits the amount of souffle dough, the souffle will rise above the mold and look very impressive. Ideally, the mold should be ¾ full. If you use a flat dish, the baking time is probably shorter.

The instant noodles can be omitted, they are mostly included to fill you up. If there are instant noodles in it, you don't need to add them, and vice versa.

If the souffle collapses, it still tastes good. Call it "Oven Omelette" instead :-)

(End)
Emigrant Bread

Green salad

Kofta - Lentil balls with nuts and spices
(4 people) (Start 2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 3 tbsp oil

 1 small onion

 1 carrot

 1 stalk celery

 2 cloves of crushed garlic

 1 fresh chili

 1 tablespoon curry (pasta)

 125 g red lentils

 3 dl broth

 1 tablespoon tomato puree

 60 g breadcrumbs

 50 g cashews/walnuts

 1 tablespoon fresh coriander/parsley

 1 egg

 salt and pepper

 (optional garam masala to sprinkle with)

 2.5 dl natural yoghurt

 2 tbsp fresh coriander/parsley

 2 tbsp mango chutney

Method:
Rinse 125 g of red lentils in a strainer and let them drain

Put a bouillon cube in a measuring cup and pour 3 dL of boiling water over it

Peel 1 carrot and peel 1 small onion

Cut the bottom and top of 1 stalk of celery and rinse it. Cut it into pieces.

Peel two cloves of garlic

Rinse and deseed the chilli. Maybe rubber gloves are a good idea.

Finely chop all the vegetables. Use possibly a stick blender with a chopping glass. If it can't be there at once, chop smaller portions and pour the chopped into a Margrethe bowl.

Saute the vegetables in 2 tablespoons of oil for approx. 5 minutes

Add 1 tablespoon curry (pasta) and stir

Add the rinsed lentils and fry for a further 1 minute.

Add the broth and 1 tablespoon of tomato puree and simmer for 20 minutes until all the liquid has been absorbed

Finely chop 50 g of cashew nuts while it is boiling. Use possibly the chopping glass. It does not need to be washed up beforehand

Weigh out 60 g of breadcrumbs

Chop 2-3 tablespoons of coriander or parsley. Divide it into two portions.

Break the egg into a cup and whisk it together

Take the vegetables off the heat and let it cool for 5 minutes, uncovered, before stirring in the following

rasp

finely chopped nuts

half of the chopped coriander

beaten egg

½ tsp salt and pepper

Take the plates out of the oven and turn it on to 180°C. Put baking paper on a baking tray

If rice is served, now is the time to put them on top (Recipe below)

Place the stuffing in walnut-sized balls on a baking sheet, drizzle with oil and sprinkle with garam masala if desired

Bake for 15-20 minutes at 180º until they are golden.

While the koftas are in the oven, stir 2.5 dL of yoghurt with the rest of the chopped coriander and 1-2 tablespoons of mango chutney

Served with the dressing and rice.
Maybe cucumber sticks and diced tomatoes.

(End)
Rice

Lasagna - with mushrooms and spinach
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 onion

 1 carrot

 1-2 stalks of celery

 500 g of mushrooms

 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

 2 tbsp tomato concentrate

 2 teaspoons lemon juice

 1 teaspoon of sugar

 1 tsp thyme

 1 teaspoon of salt

 1 bay leaf


 200-250 g spinach

 150 g cottage cheese


 25 g of butter

 3 tablespoons of flour

 5 dL whole milk

 1 tsp grated nutmeg

 ¾ teaspoon salt or bouillon powder or ½ bouillon cube

 60 g grated parmesan (or Western cheese)


 ~250 g lasagne sheets (or half a portion of homemade pasta dough)

Method:
Start with the tomato sauce:

 Grease a large ovenproof dish

 Open 1 can of peeled tomatoes

 Chop 1 onion

 Peel and grate 1 carrot coarsely (or chop it finely)

 Chop 1-2 stalks of celery

 Clean and chop 500 g of mushrooms (they take up quite a bit, so maybe they should be in a Margrethe bowl)

 Heat up a saute pan or a large pot and add 1 tablespoon of oil

 Saute the onion and, a little later, the celeriac without it taking on colour

 Add the carrot and stir for a minute

 Add the mushrooms and fry until the moisture is drawn out and they begin to boil

 Add the peeled tomatoes from the can and 2 tablespoons of tomato concentrate

 Add 2 teaspoons of lemon juice

 Add 1 teaspoon sugar and 1 teaspoon thyme

 Add 1 bay leaf and 1 teaspoon of salt and stir well. Put the lid on and turn down to 3 (out of 9). Let the tomato sauce boil while you make the bechamel sauce and steam the spinach

Make the bechamel sauce:

 Measure out 5 dL whole milk

 Grate 60 g Parmesan or Western cheese

 Set a timer for 2 minutes

 Grate some nutmeg on a fine grater until there is 1 teaspoon of grated nutmeg

 Melt 35 g of butter in a small saucepan (9 out of 9). It should not turn brown

 When the butter has melted, turn it down to 7 (out of 9) and add 3 tablespoons of flour and stir until the flour and butter are well mixed.

 Stir well with a whisk while adding the milk a little at a time.

If too much milk is added, it can be difficult to stir out the lumps.
Every time the mixture is smooth, add more milk.
If there are lumps, keep stirring until the lumps are removed. If it goes completely wrong, you can use a stick blender.
A tip to stir well all over the base is to draw "810" with the whisk over and over.

 When the milk is stirred in, stir until it boils, and then turn down to 3 (out of 9).

 Cook the bechamel sauce through for 2 minutes , stirring constantly .
Start the timer when the sauce boils.

The sauce burns easily. If you can see that it is burnt, you must not touch the burnt part, or possibly pour the sauce into a clean pot and continue in it. (If what has grown stuck to the bottom of the pot is not brown or black, it can probably be stirred out)

 Add the grated nutmeg and half of the grated cheese. Stir well

 Add ¾ teaspoon salt or bouillon powder or ½ bouillon cube. Season with salt or broth.

 Put the lid on, take the pot off the heat and turn off the heat.

 Turn on the oven at 200°. Remember to take the plates out.

Then steam the spinach:

 Rinse the spinach if fresh spinach is used, and put it in a large pot with the remaining water. Turn on 9 (out of 9) and steam the spinach until it has collapsed. Stir occasionally. If the spinach is frozen, dry it up in a pan of 5-6 (out of 9). Remember to stir once in a while

 Pour the spinach into a strainer or colander and squeeze out the water with the ladle

 Mix the spinach with 150 g cottage cheese and ½ teaspoon salt

Now assemble the lasagna:

 First taste the tomato sauce and the béchamel sauce to see if more salt is needed

 Add bechamel sauce to the bottom of the greased ovenproof dish so that it just covers it

 Cover the base with lasagna sheets. Maybe some of them need to be broken into pieces

 Put half of the tomato sauce on top of the plates and cover with plates

 Spread a thin layer of bechamel sauce over the plates

 Put half of the spinach-cottage cheese mixture in the dish and cover with plates

 Spread a thin layer of bechamel sauce over the plates

 Spread the rest of the tomato sauce evenly over the plants and cover with plates

 Spread a thin layer of bechamel sauce over the plates

 Put the rest of the spinach-cottage cheese mixture in the dish and cover with plates

 Spread the rest of the spinach-cottage cheese mixture evenly and cover with sheets

 Pour the rest of the bechamel sauce over the lasagna so that the entire surface is covered. If there is too little sauce, you can stir a little milk into the pan to add the last. The lasagna sheets must be covered to be cooked/softened

 Sprinkle the rest of the grated cheese over it and put the lasagna on top for 35-40 minutes until the cheese has taken on a little colour. Remember to set the timer

Serve with salad if desired

(End)
Fish

Machine cod - fish steamed in butter and curry
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 500-750 g haddock fillet (See tip below)

 1 kg of potatoes

Method:
Peel the potatoes and make sure they are cut into roughly equal pieces.

Place them on the hob and turn up the heat. Check that they are just covered with water and put the lid on.

When the pot boils, turn down to 2 (out of 9) and set a timer for 15 minutes.

Put blobs of butter in the bottom of a pan, cut the fillets into suitable pieces and place them in the pan

Sprinkle with salt, pepper and curry and place several pats of butter on top.

Put the lid on and place the fish on a hotplate and turn up to 5 (out of 9). Turn down if it boils

When the timer beeps, insert the potatoes. They are done when they are not hard in the middle. Maybe they need 2-5 more minutes.

Drain the water from the potatoes.

Put the pan back on the burner and steam the potatoes dry. Put the lid back on and take the pan off the heat.

Check if the fish is white and flaky. If it doesn't fall apart and is shiny in the middle, it should be a little longer. Be careful not to give it too much, as it can become dry and boring.

Serve the fish with the potatoes. Pour the butter sauce in the bottom of the pan over the potatoes.

(Possibly served with salad)

Tip: All kinds of cod fish can be used, such as dark flounder, light flounder, ling, haddock, hake, ...

(End)
Haddock on devil's mane - fish with tomato and strong paprika
(4 people) (Start 1.5 hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 lemon

 500-750 g haddock fillet

 1-2 onions

 2-3 chilies (preferably several colors)

 1 tablespoon paprika

 1 tin of peeled tomatoes (400 g)

 (2 tablespoons parsley)

 (2 tbsp basil)

 (2-3 splashes of Tabasco)

Method:
Grease an ovenproof dish (approx. 20 x 25 cm)

Squeeze the lemon and put the juice in a Margrethe bowl

Put the haddock fillets in the Margrethe bowl and turn them around until they are covered in lemon juice

Chop 1-2 onions

Clean and chop the chillies

(Chop 2 tablespoons parsley and 2 tablespoons basil)

Open the can of peeled tomatoes

Find 1 tablespoon of paprika

Heat a pot and find a wooden spatula to stir

Add 2 tablespoons of oil and fry the onion until it is clear, but has not taken colour

Add the chopped chillies and fry them briefly

Add 1 tablespoon paprika and stir

Add the peeled tomatoes and stir well

(Add the chopped parsley and basil)

Add ¾ teaspoon of salt (and a few splashes of Tabasco) and stir

Bring the tomatoes to the boil, turn down the heat and stir

Put the lid on and cook on low heat for 15 minutes (Remember to set a timer)

Turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to remove the plates)

It is now time to add rice (Recipe below). As one of the few dishes, parboiled rice suits better than basmati rice, but basmati can easily be used.

When the timer for the tomato sauce beeps, pour a little tomato sauce into the bottom of the greased, fireproof dish

Drain the haddock fillets a little and place them on top of the tomato sauce in the ovenproof dish

Pour the rest of the tomato sauce over so that the fish is completely covered

Put the dish in the hot oven and set a timer for 15 minutes

Serve with the rice and possibly a salad

(End)
Rice

Green salad

Italian Fish Soup
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before. 2 hours if you make Emigrant Bread too)

Ingredients:
 1 onion

 4 cloves of garlic

 3-4 stalks of celery

 1 bunch parsley

 4-6 dried chillies (or 2-3 fresh)

 2 tbsp olive oil K

 1 can of clams

 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

 1.5 dL red wine (or 1.5 dL water with 2 tablespoons wine vinegar)

 500 g fish fillet


 (Buy flutes or Emigrant bread for)

Method:
 (If you want to make Emigrant bread, start by making them so they can rise while you make the soup. Recipe below)

 Remove the skin from 1 onion and chop it

 Remove the skin from 4 cloves of garlic and chop them finely

 Clean 3-4 stalks of celery and chop them

 Rinse a bunch of parsley and chop it finely

 If you use fresh chillies, they must be cleaned and chopped finely. Consider wearing gloves

 Measure out 1.5 dL of red wine (or 1.4 dL of water and add 2 tablespoons of wine vinegar)

 Measure out 6 dL of water

 Open the can of clams and pour the contents into the water

 Open the can of peeled tomatoes

 Heat up a pan and add 2 tablespoons of olive oil when it is hot

 Saute onion and then garlic

 Add celery and chilli and continue to fry

 Add clams and fry for a minute or two

 Let the parsley sizzle for a short while

 Add red wine (or water with wine vinegar) and peeled tomatoes

 Put in the 500 g of fish fillet and top up with the 6 dL of water until it covers

 Bring it all to the boil, stir and turn down to 2 (out of 9)

 Let the soup cook for 40 minutes under the lid

 (If you are baking Emigrant Bread, turn on the oven now (Remember to remove the plates). Set a timer for 10 minutes and turn on the oven at 200°)

 (When the timer rings, put the Emingrants in for 12-16 minutes with hot air. Remember to set a timer)

 (When the timer rings, the Emingrant breads are taken out and cooled slightly on a wire rack)

 Serve the soup with Emigrant Bread or buy-flutes that have been heated in the oven according to the instructions on the bag

(End)
Emigrant Bread

Hornfish with herbs
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 2-3 cleaned hornfish (June-August)

 1 onion

 1 leek

 1-3 cloves of garlic

 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

 2 dL white wine (or 1:3 apple cider vinegar and water)

 1 bunch of parsley (and preferably sage, basil, ...)

Method:
Clean the leek and cut it into slices (0.5 cm thick)

Chop 1 onion and 1-3 cloves of garlic

Chop parsley (and other herbs). Preferably a good handful

Open the can/carton of peeled tomatoes

Pour 2 dL white wine (or make a mixture of 0.5 dL apple cider vinegar and 1.5 dL water)

Heat a pan and add 1-2 tablespoons of oil

Immediately add onion and leek to the pan and fry until the pieces are slightly transparent

Add the garlic and stir briefly

Add white wine and peeled tomatoes

Stir in 1 teaspoon dried thyme (or a sprig of fresh thyme), 1 bay leaf

Boil on low heat while cooking rice and frying fish

 Put rice on top (Recipe below)

Spread rye flour on a large plate and mix 1 teaspoon of salt and freshly ground pepper into the flour

Roll the hornfish pieces in the flour until they are covered in flour

Heat a frying pan and put ½ dL of oil and 20 grams of butter on the pan

When it has melted, turn it down to half flame and lightly brown the pieces of hornfish on all sides

Put the fried fish pieces into the tomato sauce and let them cook

Set a timer for 5 minutes

Add chopped herbs and cook for a further 5 minutes. Remember hours.

Served with rice (and possibly a salad)

(End)
Rice

Thai curry with fish and pineapple
(4 people) (Start 45 minutes before)

Ingredients:
 500 g of fish

 1 large can of pineapple

 7 cm galangal

 2 stalks lemongrass

 fresh basil

 125 g prawns

 2 tablespoons red curry paste

 1 can of coconut milk

 2 tablespoons fish sauce

 2 teaspoons brown sugar

 2-3 chillies

 6 kaffir lime leaves

Method:
Put rice on top (Recipe below)

Clean and cut 2-3 chillies into long thin strips

Measure out 1-2 tablespoons of curry paste, 2 teaspoons of brown sugar and 2 tablespoons of fish sauce and open the can of coconut milk

Heat a pan and add 2 tablespoons of oil (if the oil smokes when it comes in, the pan was too hot and must be cleaned before trying again)

Fry 1-2 tablespoons of red curry paste in the oil for a few seconds

Add the chili strips and stir

Add 2 teaspoons of brown sugar and stir

Pour in 2 tablespoons of fish sauce and stir briefly

Pour the coconut milk into the pan and stir. Let the mixture simmer under the lid while the rest is made.

Cut the fish into large cubes and put the pieces of fish in a pan

Cover the fish with water so that it just covers

Peel 5-7 cm galangal root and cut it into thick slices

Cut the root end of 2 stalks of lemongrass and remove discolored leaves. Crush the thick part slightly (use the end of the knife or a rolling pin)

Rinse 4-5 sprigs of basil

Add the galangal, basil and lemongrass to the fish and stir until everything is just under water

Slowly bring the pan to the boil (turn on 7 out of 9) and let the fish simmer for 2 minutes

Add the prawns and bring the water to the boil again

When the fish and prawns have simmered for 1 minute, turn off the flame and add the fish to the coconut and pineapple mixture

Rinse and crush 5-6 lime leaves lightly in your hand and put them on top of the curry

Rinse some basil leaves and put them on top of the curry

Serve with rice

(End)
Rice


Artichoke-mussel soup
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

A rather expensive soup, but very delicious and quite easy to make

Ingredients:
 1-2 onions

 25 g of butter

 1 can of artichoke hearts

 3 tablespoons of flour

 1 bottle/can of ½ L lobster soup (The more expensive the soup, the more lobster there is in it. The one from Nexø can be used. You can use (chicken) broth instead or to dilute with if there is less than one half a liter in the bottle)

 1 tin of clams (for flavor)

 1 bay leaf

 1 tablespoon chopped parsley

 1 tsp thyme

 ¼ teaspoon chilli

 ½ tsp freshly ground pepper

 ½-1 tsp (smoked) salt (You can buy smoked salt once in a while. Buy it if you like to add a smoky flavor without bacon)

 2 dL cream

 1 dL creme fraiche

 1 can of smoked clams (to go in)

Accessories: Good flutes or Emigrant Bread (Recipe below)

Method:
 (If you are making Emigrant Bread (Recipe below) then start by making the dough and set the small loaves to rise before starting the rest. Heat the oven when it says something about frozen flutes later, and put the Emigrant Breads in when the oven is hot)

Peel and chop an onion

 Open the can of artichoke hearts and pour off the water. Cut each artichoke heart into quarters

 Open the bottle/can of lobster soup

 Open both cans of mussels and put the smoked mussels in a strainer so that the oil can drip off. The water from the common mussels is saved

 (Now is the time to turn on the oven if you want to thaw frozen flutes)

 Melt 25 g of butter in a medium-sized pan and fry the onion without colouring

 Add artichoke hearts and fry briefly

 Add 3 tablespoons of flour and stir well

 Add lobster soup a little at a time while stirring, just like when you make bechamel sauce (See how in the recipe for Lasagna, if necessary)

 When the lobster soup has been stirred, add water and mussels from the can of ordinary mussels

 Stir until it boils and then turn down to 3 (out of 9)

 Add 1 tablespoon chopped parsley, 1 bay leaf, 1 teaspoon thyme, ¼ teaspoon chili and ½ teaspoon freshly ground pepper and stir well

 Simmer for approx. 10 minutes before the bay leaf is fished out and the soup is blended with the stick blender

 (Now is the time to put frozen flutes in the oven if you have someone to thaw)

 Stir 1 teaspoon of flour into 1 dL of creme fraiche to prevent the creme fraiche from separating when it is added to the hot soup

 Add 2 dL of cream and the creme fraiche and stir while the soup is gently heated while stirring. It must not boil again! Then it separates and it doesn't look so good. If necessary, use an oven thermometer set to 80° C

 Add the drained smoked mussels and serve with warm flutes or Emingrant Bread

(End)
Emigrant Bread

Sweet and sour fish
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 4 pike or grouper (Or 2 mackerel)

 ½-1 dL cornmeal

 1 dL of oil

 1-2 cloves of garlic

 3-5 cm ginger root

 1 onion

 250 g cherry tomatoes

 2 tablespoons red wine vinegar/balsamic vinegar

 2 tablespoons brown sugar

 2 tbsp tomato concentrate

 1 tablespoon fish sauce

 2 teaspoons cornstarch ( Maizena )

 3 tablespoons of water

 (1 bunch coriander)

 (1 red onion)

Method:
Rinse the fish and dry it on kitchen paper

Cut the head, tail and fins off each fish

Make three oblique cuts in the skin on each side of each fish (Down to the spine)

Put rice on top (Recipe below)

Peel and chop an onion and 1-2 cloves of garlic

Peel 3-5 cm of ginger root and grate the ginger finely on a grater.

Rinse the cherry tomatoes

In a cup comes

2 tablespoons red wine vinegar/balsamic vinegar

2 tablespoons brown sugar

2 tbsp tomato concentrate

1 tablespoon fish sauce

In a cup, stir 2 teaspoons of cornstarch into 3 tablespoons of water

If you want to decorate with coriander and red onion strips, rinse 3-8 coriander sprigs and prepare the red onion like a normal onion and cut into thin slices

Sprinkle the fish with cornmeal and shake off excess flour

Heat a pan and add 1 dL of oil

When the oil is hot, turn down to 6 out of 9

Carefully add the fish and fry them for 5-7 minutes on each side

While they are frying, place 3 layers of kitchen paper on a plate

Remove the fish from the pan and place them on the paper towel on the plate to drain

A saute pan or a large pot is heated and 1 tablespoon of oil is added

The chopped onion and garlic are lightly fried. It must not turn brown

Add the grated ginger and stir

Put in the cherry tomatoes and fry them until the skin splits

Pour in the mixture of sugar, vinegar, tomato paste and fish sauce

Turn down the heat and let it simmer for a few minutes

Taste with sugar or vinegar if necessary

Stir in the water-cornstarch mixture and cook until the sauce thickens slightly

Put the fish in the sauce and turn them around

Garnish if desired with coriander sprigs and slices of red onion

Serve with rice and possibly a salad

(End)
Rice

Green salad

Chicken

Chicken with rosemary and honey
(3 – 4 people) (Start 2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 chicken

 1 tablespoon sea salt

 ½ - 1 tsp freshly ground pepper

 2 tbsp finely chopped fresh rosemary/2 tsp dried

 3 tablespoons of honey

 olive oil

Method:
 The day before: If the chicken is frozen, take it out of the freezer and put it in the fridge on a plate

 Fill the Römertopf with water so that it can absorb moisture

Add 1 tbsp sea salt, ½ - 1 tsp freshly ground pepper, 2 tbsp finely chopped fresh rosemary (2 tsp dried) to 3 tbsp honey and mix well

Remove the plastic bag from the chicken and check if there is a bag of giblets inside the chicken

Put the chicken on its back in the Römertopfen (if there is giblets, put it next to the chicken except for the liver. Give the liver to a cat you like)

Spread/drip/scrape the honey mixture onto the surface of the chicken

Drizzle with olive oil

Put the lid on and place the Römertopfen in a cold oven on the lower rack. If it gets into a hot oven, it can break. Once you have heated up the oven, ventilate it for 1 minute and place the Römertopfen on a cold baking sheet at the bottom of the oven.

Turn on the oven at 225° C and set a timer for 1½ hours

The chicken will be extra nice brown if you remember to take the Römertopfen out of the oven approx. every half hour and drizzle the chicken with the juice at the bottom. Be careful not to burn yourself and do not put the lid on anything wet or cold. Place the lid on a dry board/table mat or an extra pot holder

Serve with Hasselbach potatoes (Recipe below) and possibly salad. Start on the potatoes when the chicken is put in.

If you don't have enough energy to make Hasselbach potatoes, baked potatoes are fine (Recipe below)

(End)
Hasselbach potatoes

Baked potatoes

Chicken with cashew nuts
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1-2 red onions

 1-2 cloves of garlic

 2-300 g chicken breast

 4 tbsp oil

 2-6 dried chillies

 1 tablespoon oyster sauce

 1 tablespoon fish sauce

 ½ teaspoon brown sugar

 1-2 tsp curry paste

 ½ dL bouillon or water

 50 g cashews

Method:
 Start by adding rice (Recipe below)

 Boil some water and put ½ dL of boiling water in a cup with some bouillon powder or ¼ bouillon cube

 Remove the skin from 1-2 red onions and cut them into slightly thick rings

 Remove the skin from 1-2 cloves of garlic and chop them finely

 Cut 2-300 g of chicken into strips about the size of a little finger

 Find a saucer and place it next to the stove with 2-6 dried chillies

 Heat up a saute pan or frying pan (9 out of 9). When the pan is very hot, take it off the heat and add 50 g of cashew nuts. Stir while the cashews are roasting

 When the cashews are ready, place them on a saucer and heat the pan again

 When the pan is hot, add 4 tablespoons of oil and add the dried chillies and fry a little. They must not turn black.

 Pick up the chillies and put them back on the saucer

 Turn down to 6 (out of 9)

 Saute the chopped garlic briefly

 Add the shredded chicken and fry while stirring

 Add 1 tablespoon oyster sauce and 1 tablespoon fish sauce and stir.
Briefly place the pan over a cold burner if it starts to burn

 Add ½ teaspoon of brown sugar and 1-2 teaspoons of curry paste and fry briefly

 Add half a deciliter of broth (or just water). Stir well so that what is burnt on is loosened

 Cover and cook for a few minutes

 When the chicken is tender, add the red onion rings, the cashew nuts and the fried chillies. Stir well and serve with rice and possibly salad

(End)
Rice

Green salad

Chicken and noodle one-pot
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 onion

 2 cloves of garlic

 3-4 cm ginger root

 1 red onion

 250-350 g chicken breast (or turkey breast)

 2 dL chicken broth

 1 tbsp oil

 1-2 tbsp red curry paste

 1 can of coconut milk

 250 g Chinese egg noodles

 2-3 teaspoons lime juice

 (fresh basil leaves, preferably Thai basil)

Method:
 Peel the onion and chop it

 Peel the red onion and cut it into slices. Halve the slices

 Remove the skin from 2 cloves of garlic and chop them finely

 Peel a 3-4 cm piece of ginger root and grate it finely

 Cut 250-350 g of chicken breast into strips the size of a little finger

 Open the can of coconut milk

 Make 1 dL chicken broth

 Heat up a saute pan or a large pot and add 1 tablespoon of oil

 Add the onion and fry it a little without it taking on colour

 Add garlic, red onion and ginger and fry briefly

 Add the chicken strips and fry them until they have changed color on all sides

 Add 1-2 tablespoons of red curry paste, depending on how strong you want the food, and stir well

 Stir in 2 dl of chicken broth and make sure to stir whatever is at the bottom of the broth loose

 Add the coconut milk and ½ teaspoon of salt and stir

 Bring it to the boil and add the egg noodles, broken into small pieces. Stir until the noodles are covered and put a lid on (or possibly deep plates so they can get warm)

 Cook for 5-8 minutes until the noodles are cooked. Remember to set a timer for 5 minutes and then fish up a piece of noodle with a fork, blow on it and taste if it is tender

 While the noodles are cooking, pick off the basil leaves and rinse them if you want to serve them

 Add 2-3 teaspoons of lime juice and serve immediately in deep plates with extra lime that people can drizzle on themselves.

(End)
Tartlets with chicken and asparagus
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 1-2 packs of ready-made tartlet shells (3-5 per person)

 1-2 glasses of white asparagus

 3-400 g chicken or turkey breast

 40-50 g butter

 4 tablespoons of flour

 4 dL water or milk

Method:
 Boil the chicken breast in enough water to just cover, approx. 10-15 minutes.

 Save the cooking water and cut the chicken breast pieces into 1x1 cm cubes.

 Cut the asparagus into 2 cm long pieces.

 Turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to remove the plates)

 Place the tartlet shells bottom side up on baking paper. Wait to put them in until the sauce is ready.

 Set the table now, as tartlets must be eaten warm from the oven.

 Make a bechamel sauce: Melt the butter in a pan without it turning brown. Stir in a little over ½ dL of flour (4 tablespoons) and slowly top up with 4 dL of the cooking water from the chicken breast. If there is not enough boiling water, supplement with milk or cream.

 Let the sauce boil for 2-3 minutes while whisking thoroughly. Be sure to scrape the entire bottom of the pan regularly.

 Season the sauce with salt and pepper and heat the chicken thighs and asparagus pieces in the sauce. The flame must be on 1-2 and it must be stirred carefully once in a while.

 Put the tartlet shells in the oven and heat them for as long as it says on the box they came in. Typically 5-7 minutes.

 Call people when you have put the shells in the oven and serve the shells warm from the oven with the sauce.

(End)
Bao - steamed buns with chicken
(4 people – 2 Bao for each)
(Start 2½ hours before)

Ingredients:
Dough:

 3 dL water (possibly 2.1 dL from the tap and 0.9 dL boiling water to get 37º hot water)

 25 g of yeast

 2 teaspoons of sugar

 2 tbsp oil

 approx. 500 g flour


Filling:

 1 onion

 4 carrots

 1 tbsp oil

 ½ tsp star anise

 ½ tsp Szechuan pepper

 1-2 teaspoons of soy sauce

 1 tablespoon oyster sauce

 ½ tsp salt

 1 fried chicken breast (150 g)

 (2 tbsp fresh coriander)


Dip 1:
 1 tbsp oil

 3-6 cloves of garlic

 4-5 tablespoons of soy sauce

 Possibly. chili


Dip 2:
 5 tablespoons balsamic vinegar

 ½ teaspoon honey or dark sugar

 5 cm ginger

 Dill

Procedure: Dough:
 Weigh out 600 g of flour and find the oil and sugar

Measure out 3 dL of water and put it in a Margrethe bowl or a large pot.

Dissolve 25 g of yeast in the water and add half of the flour

Add 2 teaspoons of sugar and 2 tablespoons of oil and start kneading the dough together

Add flour while kneading until the dough is well kneaded and comes off the fingers and table.

Let the dough rise for approx. 45 minutes while the filling and dip are made. Put any one minute

Dip 1:
 Finely chop 3-6 cloves of garlic and fry them briefly in a little oil. It should not turn brown

 Put the garlic and some of the oil into a small serving bowl

 Put 4-5 tablespoons of soy sauce in the bowl and possibly a little dried chili

Dip 2:
 Peel 5 cm of ginger and cut it into matchstick-thick strips

 Put 5 tablespoons of balsamic vinegar in a small serving bowl and stir ½ teaspoon of honey or dark sugar into the vinegar

 Add the ginger to the balsamic and add the dried dill and stir. Freshly chopped dill can be used instead.

Filling:
 Pound 1 star anise in a mortar. Pour the powder into a glass

Pound 1 teaspoon of Szechuan pepper into the mortar and leave until ready to use

Peel 4 carrots and grate the carrots

Remove the skin from 1 onion and chop the onion finely

Heat 1 tablespoon of oil in a pan and fry the onion without turning brown

Add the grated carrots and stir well until the carrots have collapsed a little

Add ½ teaspoon ground star anise and ½ teaspoon ground Szechuan pepper

Stir and take the pan off the heat

Stir in 1-2 teaspoons of soy sauce, 1 tablespoon of oyster sauce, ½ teaspoon of salt and (optionally) 2 tablespoons of fresh coriander

 Chop the fried chicken breast quite finely and stir it thoroughly into the carrot/onion mixture

 Taste if more seasoning is needed

Cut out two circles of parchment paper to line the bottom of the steamer inserts. If you only have a steel steam cooker insert, you must cook the buns twice

 Divide the dough into 8 pieces and roll out the pieces into circles the size of a dessert plate (approx. 15 cm in diameter)

 Distribute the filling on the dough circles and fold the dough up around the filling so that the dough forms a bag around the filling. Pinch the opening tightly and place each bun in the steamer with the opening facing down on the baking paper.

 Put 1-2 cm of water in the bottom of a large pot, put the steamer in the pot and put the lid on

 Bring the pan to the boil, turn down to 4 out of 9 and let the buns cook for 20 minutes after the water boils. Remember to turn on the hood.

Set the table and serve the bao buns with dip

(End)
Caribbean chicken - with fruit and coconut
(4-6 people) (Start 3 hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 chicken

 ½ can of coconut milk

 4 bananas

 1-2 peppers

 1 red onion or 3 spring onions

 1 tray of mushrooms

 2 tablespoons chives

 1 mango

 1 melon

 1 chilli

 100 g grapes

 3 tablespoons cashews

Start with spice mix:

Chop a red onion or 3 spring onions.

Put 1 tablespoon of chopped onion in a Margrethe bowl. Save the rest of the onion.

Notch

a little chilli and

1 clove of garlic. Put it in the bowl for the onion.

Place 2 allspice in a mortar and pulverize. Put in the bowl.

Came

1 tsp paprika,

¼ teaspoon cinnamon

¼ teaspoon grated nutmeg and

½ tablespoon of thyme in the bowl.

Put ¼ teaspoon of salt and 2-3 splashes of Tabasco in the bowl.

Put ½ can of coconut milk (and ½ dL of rum) in the bowl and stir well.

Cut the chicken into pieces and turn the pieces into the marinade in the Margrethe bowl

(If there is time:) Let the chicken soak for 1-2 hours in the fridge with a lid over the bowl.

Set a next-thing timer for 1-2 hours.

Rinse the Römertopfen inside (Instead of using the Römertopfen, you can saute vegetables and chicken, add the marinade and cook for 50 minutes)

Clean and chop 1-2 peppers.

Clean the mushrooms and cut them into slices.

Add peppers, mushrooms and the last onion to the bottom of the Römertopfen.

Put the chicken and marinade in the Römertopfen and put the lid on

Place the Römertopfen on a plate on the bottom groove.

Turn on the oven at 225° (Remember to remove the plates) and set a timer for 1.5 hours.

Set a next-thing timer for 30 minutes.

Put rice on top (Recipe below)

Grease an ovenproof dish.

Cut 4 bananas into slices and place them in the ovenproof dish.

(Drip with ½ dL rum)

Sprinkle with cinnamon (approx. ½-1 teaspoon)

Put small blobs of butter on the bananas (approx. 1-2 tablespoons)

Bake the bananas in the middle of the oven for 15-20 minutes

While the chicken and bananas are in the oven, the table is set and the fruit is prepared:

Rinse the grapes and halve them and remove the seeds.

Rinse the mango and cut it into pieces.

Halve the melon and remove the seeds. Save one half and dice the other half.

Coarsely chop 3 tablespoons of cashews.

Chop the chives so that there is approx. 2 tbsp.

Take the Römertopfen out of the oven and remove the lid.

Add fruit and cashew nuts to the Römertopfen

Sprinkle with coconut flour and chives

Serve with rice.

Bonus: Rinse lettuce leaves and garnish with them

(End)
Rice

Meat

Beef in a dish - with corn and cottage cheese
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 500 g corn

 1 tbsp oil

 4-500 g minced beef

 4-5 tomatoes or 1 tin of peeled tomatoes

 2 tbsp tomato concentrate

 1 teaspoon of salt

 ½ teaspoon cinnamon

 250 g cottage cheese

 (A pot of chives)

 2-3 tablespoons of grated parmesan

Method:
 Grease an ovenproof dish and put 500 g of corn in the bottom. They must be frozen

 Turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to take out the plates) and insert the dish with the corn while the oven heats up, if the corn is frozen. Set a timer for 12 minutes and take out the dish when the timer rings

 Wash 4-5 tomatoes and cut them into wedges (or open the tin of peeled tomatoes)

 Heat a pan and add 1 tablespoon of oil. Fry 4-500 g of minced beef until all the meat has lost its red color. Perhaps it is good to do it in two batches, so that the meat is seared and not cooked in its own juices

 Add ½ teaspoon of cinnamon to the meat and stir briefly

 Add the tomatoes to the meat and stir. Add 2 tablespoons of tomato concentrate

 Cook the meat sauce for 5 minutes and then spread it over the corn in the ovenproof dish

Bake the dish at 200° (Remember to take out the plates when you turn on the oven) for 15 minutes. Remember to set a timer

 (If you use chives, it must be rinsed and cut into ½ cm long pieces now, and stirred into 250 g of cottage cheese)

 Take the dish out of the oven and spread 250 g cottage cheese over the meat sauce

 Sprinkle with 2-3 tablespoons of grated Parmesan cheese (or Western cheese)

Bake the dish for another 15 minutes and serve. The corn is filling so no side dishes are necessary, but you can serve salad or grissini with it

(End)
Beef in a dish - with mashed potatoes
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 50 g of butter

 1 onion

 600 g minced beef

 1-2 tsp paprika

 1 dL tomato concentrate

 1 teaspoon of salt

 1 kg of potatoes

 1-2 dL milk or potato water

 (50 g butter)

 2-3 teaspoons of salt

Method:
Start by peeling the potatoes for mashed potatoes

Cut the potatoes into cubes and put them in a pot and fill with water until it just covers

Set a timer and cook the potatoes for 20 minutes without salt , as the mashed potatoes will have a poor consistency if you add salt too early

 While the potatoes are cooking, chop 1 onion and put 50 g of butter in a pan

 Find paprika and meat

 Pour the water from the potatoes into a Margrethe bowl when the timer rings. (Or in the sink if you use milk)

 (Add 50 g of butter to the potatoes)

 Mash the potatoes with a potato masher or an electric whisk

 When all the potato lumps have been mashed, whisk in 1-2 dL of milk or potato water until the consistency is suitable. It must not be too thin.

 Season with 2-3 teaspoons of salt. You need more salt in mashed potatoes than you think, but add a little at a time so that it doesn't suddenly become too salty

 Melt the 50 g of butter in the pan and let it bubble up

Saute the onion, and add 1-2 teaspoons of paprika when the onion is transparent

 Put half the meat in the pan and sear it until it is no longer red. If it starts to grow on the bottom and become too brown, you can add a little water and loosen the burnt-on before it turns black and tastes bad

 Add the rest of the meat and sear it. (If there is too much liquid for the meat to be seared, you can empty the contents of the pan into a Margrethe bowl and put a splash of oil in the pan before adding the last meat. You can also just stir it around until it loses colour, but the searing gives extra good taste because the sugars caramelise)

 Add 1 dL tomato concentrate and 1 teaspoon salt and stir well

Put the lid on and turn down to 1.

 Turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to remove the plates)

Let the meat sauce simmer for approx. 10 minutes while you grease a medium-sized ovenproof dish and the oven heats up.

 Put the meat sauce in the dish when the oven is hot and spread the mashed potatoes over as a lid with a spatula

 Place the dish in the oven for 25 minutes (remember the timer) until the surface has just turned slightly brown in a few places

 Set the table and possibly make a salad while it is in the oven

 Server

Tip: Instead of peeling and boiling potatoes, you can cut a cross on the top of 4-5 large baking potatoes and bake them for 1½ hours at 200° (Remember to remove the plates when you turn on the oven). It can be done 1-2 days before if you have to bake anyway. The potatoes can be left in the oven together with the bread if you use hot air. Remember to lower the temperature by 20° compared to the recipe if you use hot air

Remove the peel and mash them as described above. Baked potatoes make a really good mashed potato!

(End)
Baked goods

Rough Horn
(16 horns/buns) (Start 1-2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 50 g of yeast

 7.5 dL of water

 1.5 dL of oil

 2.5 teaspoons of salt

 375 g rye flour

 500 g flour

Method:
 Dissolve the yeast in the water.

 Weigh out 375 g of rye flour and mix it into the water.

 Add 2.5 teaspoons of salt and 1.5 dL of oil.

 Add ¾ of the flour and mix well.

 Knead in flour until the dough leaves the table when a little new flour is sprinkled on.

Rye flour doughs are stickier than others, so it can be a bit difficult to determine when there is enough flour. It is easier to work with a dry dough, but the result will also be drier and duller.

 Leave the dough to rise for half an hour (can be skipped if you are in a hurry).

 Shape the dough into buns or horns and let them rise for 20 minutes on the baking sheet. Set a timer for 10 minutes so you remember to turn on the oven at 200° in the middle of the rising (Remember to take the plates out)

 Bake for 15-20 minutes and remove to a wire rack.

Shaping horns: Divide the dough in half and roll out each half into a pizza-like disc. Cut the "pizza" into 8 pizza pieces and roll each piece into a horn, starting from the wide, round end.

(End)
Davreboller - with oatmeal
(16 large buns) (Start 1-2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 100 g yeast (possibly 50 g yeast and double the rising time)

 8 dL of water

 2 dL yogurt

 4 dL oatmeal

 2 tbsp oil

 1 tablespoon salt

 1.3 kg of flour

Method:
 Measure out 2 dL of yogurt and put it in a Margrethe bowl or a large pot.

 Add 8 dL of water to the yoghurt. You can conveniently rinse the last yogurt from the measuring cup if you measure the 8 dL of it two or three times.

 Stir the yeast into the water and yogurt. Use 100 g if it needs to go the fastest and 50 g (or 25 g) if there is time to let the dough rise for a long time.

 Add 4 dL of oatmeal.

 Add 2 tbsp oil...

 ... and 1 tablespoon of salt.

 Add 1 kg of flour and start mixing well.

 Knead in flour until the dough is free from sticking and let it rise for 30 minutes if 100 g of yeast has been used (1 hour if 50 g of yeast has been used and 1½-2 hours if 25 g of yeast has been used)

 Divide the dough in half, divide each half in half and repeat until there are 16 lumps of dough.

 Clean a baking tray, dry it well and rub it with 1 tablespoon of flour - or use baking paper.

 Form the dough into buns by "stuffing the dough into itself". You just have to turn the dough inside out. Place the buns on the baking sheet. Remember to dip the base in flour if you do not use baking paper.

 You can brush with beaten egg and sprinkle with sesame seeds if you like.

 Turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to take out the plates) and let the buns rise while the oven heats up - typically 10-15 minutes.

 Bake the buns in the middle of the oven for 20-25 minutes. Remember to set a timer.

 Take the buns out and place them on a baking tray.

(End)
Pita bread
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 5½ dL water

 50 g of yeast

 1 kg of flour

 2 teaspoons of salt

 1 teaspoon of sugar

Method:
 Put 5½ dL of water in a Margrethe bowl

 Stir 50 g of yeast into the water

 Add approx. half of 1 kg of flour

 Add 1 teaspoon of salt and 2 teaspoons of sugar

 Knead in the rest of the flour until the dough is almost free from sticking

 Let the dough rise for 30 minutes (Remember to set the timer)

 Turn on the oven at 250°. Remember to take out the plants.

 Divide the dough into 16 and shape each piece into a bun

 Clean and dry the baking trays. Set up a baking tray

 Roll out four of the buns into ½ cm thick slices and make sure the base is well floured before placing the slices on a baking sheet

 When the oven is hot, put the plate in for 3 minutes while the next buns are rolled out, floured and put on a plate

 Take the pitas out and put them on the baking tray when they are all puffed up. They should not be brown. A few small spots at most. If they get too much, they become crunchy and cut the palate

 Continue until all the pitas are baked

Pitas are served with hummus or cut open on one side and filled with lettuce, tomato, avocado, cucumber and a dressing mixed with yoghurt, paprika and tomato concentrate. You can buy frozen falafel and heat them for dinner

Leftover pitas can be frozen or heated in a toaster and filled with butter and strawberry jam

(End)
Emigrant Bread - envelope bread with garlic and sage

Casserole bread - easy bread with a lot of flavor
(1 loaf) (Start 7-14 hours before. Typically a little before you go to bed)

Ingredients:
 5 dL of water

 5 g of yeast (like a large pea or a small cherry)

 3 dL wholemeal

 7 dL flour

 2 teaspoons of salt

Method:
 Put 5 dL of water in a Margrethe bowl.

 Stir the 5 g of yeast into the water.

 Add 3 dL wholemeal and 7 dL flour

 Add 2 teaspoons of salt and stir the dough together. You don't have to knead for long. Optionally, you can stretch the dough by moistening your fingers and sticking them down the side of the bowl and lifting the dough up and over the middle. Turn the bowl a quarter of a turn and repeat until you have gone 1-2 times around.

 Cover the bowl with a plate or a lid and put it in the fridge for 7-12 hours (overnight).

 Take the dough out of the fridge. Wash your hands and stretch the dough again by pulling the dough over itself as before.

 If you have time, let the dough rise in the bowl on the kitchen table for 1-2 hours, otherwise

 Rub the inside of a Römertopf (clay pot) with flour and place it on a baking sheet at the bottom of the top. It should be open at this point (You can also use a cast iron pot with a lid without a plastic handle! )

 Turn on the oven at 250° and let it heat up well (15 minutes) with the Römertopfen in it.

 Remove the Römertopf from the top with pot holders. BEWARE: it is hot ! Remember to put it on something that can withstand the heat.
Preferably something that doesn't conduct heat well, like a coaster or a dry tea towel, as the Römertopfen can crack if it gets a temperature shock.

 Pour/scrape the dough into the mold and cover with pot holders!

 Put the hot form in the oven again and bake it for 30 minutes at 250° C. Remember to set the timer.

 Turn down to 230° C and remove the lid from the mould. Put the lid on something heatproof as before.

 Close the oven and bake for a further 15 minutes. Remember to set the timer.

 Turn the bread out of the mold and tap the bottom. If it sounds hollow, it's done.

 If you use a cast iron pan, the bread should sound hollow after 30 + 15 minutes, but with a Römertopf it should probably have 10-15 more minutes without shape at 200° C.

 Let the finished bread cool on a baking rack.

(End)
Sourdough bread
(2 pcs) (12-17 hours. Start the night before)

Ingredients:
 2 dL water at 25° (Use my Temperturmixer if necessary )

 1 tablespoon sourdough (See how to make a sourdough at the end of the recipe)

 100 g wholemeal

 100 g flour


 7 dL of water at 25°

 1-300 g of wholemeal flour

 9-700 g flour

 1½ tablespoons salt (15 g salt)

Method:
Video with the procedure

 The night before: Put 2 dL of lukewarm water in a Margrethe bowl

 Stir in 1 tablespoon of sourdough

 Add 100 g of wholemeal flour and 100 g of plain flour. Mix well

 Cover the bowl and leave it on the kitchen counter until the next day

 Weigh out 1 kg of flour in a Margrethe bowl. Up to a third can be wholemeal.

 Stir 3-4 tablespoons of the flour into the bowl of sourdough to flour it up. Put the lid back on

 Put 7 dL of water in the Margrethe bowl with flour (Possibly 4.9 dL of cold water from the tap and 2.1 dL of boiling water).
Mix flour and water well

 Let the mixture of flour and water rest for 25(-40) minutes so that the protein and starch can absorb water (This is called hydrolysis and gives better gluten development and therefore a stronger dough).
Remember to set a timer for a period of time that suits you between 25 and 40 minutes

Mix the sourdough and the hydrolysed flour and sprinkle 1½ tablespoons of salt over the dough. Stir/knead the salt well into the dough.
If you have time to stretch the dough every half hour for a few hours, it is not necessary to knead thoroughly, just distribute the salt.

If you don't want to go back and forth, knead the dough now until it doesn't stick (quite a lot).
More flour may be needed, but the wetter the dough, the better the bread.
At the start of your baking career, however, I would recommend kneading in flour until the dough is only slightly sticky.
Just before the dough feels ready, rub your hands clean with a little flour and knead the dough into the dough. Firm up the dough by putting floured hands on the dough and running it around the table in small circles so that the surface tightens up. Put the dough back in the bowl with the tightened side down ("Turn it upside down")
The flour that is on the table can be scraped together and used to feed the sourdough in the refrigerator with

 Let the dough rest.
If the dough has been kneaded thoroughly, the next kneading can be skipped, but many kneadings give better gluten development.
If the dough has not been kneaded, it only needs to rest for half an hour (remember the timer).
When the timer rings, stretch the dough by moistening your fingers and sticking them down the side of the bowl and lifting the dough up and over the middle. Turn the bowl a quarter of a turn and repeat until you have gone 1-2 times around. Cover the dough. Repeat this two or three more times:

 Let the dough rest for half an hour (remember the timer) and roll it up a second time. Cover the dough

 Let the dough rest for half an hour (remember the timer) and roll it up the 3rd time. Cover the dough

 Let the dough rest for half an hour (remember the timer) and roll it up the 4th time.
Cover the dough and let it rise for 1-4 hours, depending on how hot it is in the kitchen. Check the dough occasionally.
The dough is ready when it pushes a little on the lid.
It is not a disaster if the dough rises out of the bowl. Then simply tighten it up before going to the next step

There are two ways to bake the breads: 1) As a pot bread (recipe above) or 2) as below

 Carefully pour the dough out onto a lightly floured board and divide it into two parts with a knife or a dough scraper. Lift the edge of the dough over itself from all sides with a dough scraper, turn it upside down and tuck the dough under it by running it around in small circles with floured hands so that it is taut

 Place an empty plate on the bottom rack of the oven and set the oven to 250°. The plate must be used to throw 1 dL of water onto to create steam in the oven. If you throw water directly on the bottom of the oven, the top will eventually be destroyed. My oven bottom was badly dented before I listened to the good advice in the cookbooks :-(

 Rub flour into the surface of a clean baking sheet and gently shake off excess flour. You cannot use baking paper above 220° and too much flour will burn and smell bad

 Put the baking tray dusted with flour into the oven and let it heat up. There must be two plates in the oven while it heats up to 250°: One at the bottom without flour, and one dusted with flour

 When the oven is hot, boil 1-2 dL of water in the kettle. Pour the boiling water into a cup to drop onto the tray at the bottom of the oven. Place the cup next to the oven

Place a sharp knife or razor blade next to the cup

 Tighten the loaves again by tucking it under itself all the way around.

 The baking sheet is removed and placed on something heat-resistant, for example the stove, and the loaves are quickly and carefully lifted onto the baking sheet. You can have a flat pile of flour on the kitchen table where you briefly dip the bottom of the bread if you want to be sure that it does not stick

Cut a slit in the side of the bread. Hold the knife or razor blade almost horizontally. Then the crust opens upwards instead of just cracking

 Put the loaves in the oven on the second lowest rack. Pull out the lower plate a little and throw the water from the cup onto the plate. Immediately close the oven so that the steam stays inside. Steam gives a good surface and lets the bread rise a little longer in the oven

 Turn the oven OFF and set for 15 minutes. It sounds strange, but it prevents the crust from sticking together, so the bread can rise nicely in the oven

When the timer rings, take out the lower baking tray with water.

 TURN ON the oven again, but turn down to 230° and set the timer for 20 minutes

When the timer rings, tap the bottom of one of the loaves. If it sounds hollow, the loaves are ready and put them on a wire rack.
Otherwise, they must have 5-15 minutes more. Remember to set a timer.
(Flatter bread should take less time)

All ovens are different, so you may need to experiment with baking times and temperatures.
If the loaves turn black on top, they should have a shorter time after the oven is turned on again.
If they become doughy inside, they should have a longer time at the end.
If they are turning black too early, you can put a piece of tin foil over each loaf

The recipe here may seem confusing, but once you've tried it a few times or three it becomes routine, and you get bread that's really worth the effort :-)

(End)

Sourdough can sometimes be bought in plastic bags in the supermarket, or you can get one from someone who bakes with sourdough themselves. However, it is easy to start a sourdough yourself and they are ridiculously hardy:

 Put ½ L of water in a container with a loose lid that you can have on the kitchen table

 Add 100 g of organic wheat flour

 Stir in 100 g of organic graham flour

 Cover the container with a loose lid and leave it on the kitchen counter until the next day. If you use a jam jar, you should punch a hole in the lid with a large nail (2-3 mm) as sourdough can rise so much that the jar explodes if there is no safety valve. The sourdough also needs to breathe

 Stir the sourdough and do this every day (5-10 days) until it begins to bubble and smell of dark beer. Then it is ready for use

 Keep the container in the fridge and stir in 1 tablespoon of flour, 1 tablespoon of graham flour and a splash of water when you remember and each time you remove it. If there starts to be too much sourdough, you can just add it to the dough the next time you bake with yeast. It gives extra flavor to the yeast bread

If you use rye flour instead of graham flour, you get a rye sourdough for rye bread. Rye bread is basically just wholemeal bread where the wholemeal is replaced by rye flour, but ryebread is usually baked at 180° in a mold for 1 hour. If you want to use whole rye kernels in rye bread, they must soak overnight


Walnut balls
(16-24 pieces or 2 loaves) (Start 3 hours before)

Ingredients:
 50 g of yeast

 2 bottles of dark white beer or beer (or 6.6 dL of water)

 200 g rye flour

 800 g flour

 2 teaspoons of salt

 50-100 g walnuts

Method:
 Start by chopping the walnuts very coarsely

 Then put 2 beers (a 33 cL – or a ½ L bottle + 1.6 dL water) in a Margrethe bowl

Add 50 g of yeast to the beer and stir the yeast out

 Add 200 g of rye flour and 2 teaspoons of salt

 Weigh out 800 g of flour and gradually knead it in until the dough is smooth and pliable

 Knead the walnuts in at the very end, so they don't turn into small pieces during the kneading

 Leave the dough to rise for 1 hour (remember to set the timer)

 Shape the dough into buns (or two loaves)

 Leave to rise for ½ hour and set a timer for 20 minutes

 Turn on the oven at 225° (Remember to take out the plates) when the timer rings and set the timer for 10 minutes

 Bake the buns for 15-20 minutes until they are light brown on the bottom (Bread is baked for 30-35 minutes)

(End)
Focaccia
(1 pc) (Start 3 hours before)

Ingredients:
3.5 dL of water

20 g of yeast

500 g flour (preferably Tipo 00)

1 teaspoon of salt

6 tbsp olive oil (4 + 2 tbsp)

1½ tablespoons rosemary

Method:
Find a Margrethe bowl and put 3.5 dL of water in the bowl. (If necessary, use my Temperturmixer to get 37° hot water)

Stir 20 g of yeast into the water

Weigh out 500 g of flour and put most of it in the bowl

Add 1 teaspoon of salt

Add 4 tablespoons of olive oil and knead the dough together. Gradually add more flour.

Dry the bowl with a tot of dough and add a little olive oil to the bottom. Stretch the dough and turn it around in the oil. Put a lid on the bowl and let the dough rise for 1 hour (Remember to set a timer)

Put baking paper on a baking tray and knead the dough through. Flatten it to an approx. 2 cm thick slice.

Let the dough rise again for 1 hour (Remember to set a timer)

Turn on the oven at 220°

Put 2 tablespoons of oil in a cup and add 1 tablespoon of cold water. Whisk it together and brush the dough with the oil mixture.

Sprinkle 1½ tablespoons of rosemary over the dough and poke deep holes with your fingers. Sprinkle with coarse salt

Put the bread in the oven and bake it for 20 minutes

Take the bread out and let it cool a little before serving for e.g. soup. Focaccia tastes best warm, but can be heated in the toaster or frozen and heated in the oven (15 minutes at 200°)

(End)
Scalded graham bread
(1 pc) (Start 3 hours before)

Ingredients:
 100 g cracked wheat

 300 g graham flour

 50 g of butter

 1 teaspoon lemon juice or vinegar

 2 teaspoons of salt

 1 teaspoon of sugar

 6 dL boiling water

 50 g of yeast

 1 dL yogurt

 650 g flour

Method:
 In a Margrethe bowl, put 100 g cracked wheat, 300 g graham flour, 50 g butter, 1 teaspoon lemon juice, 2 teaspoons salt and 1 teaspoon sugar

 The boiling water is poured over and the mixture is left for at least 1 hour and drawn to soften the kernels

 Add 1 dL of yoghurt and 50 g of yeast to the mixture and stir it with a ladle

 Weigh out 650 g of flour and knead it in until the dough is almost free from sticking

 Cover the bowl and let the dough rise for 45 minutes. Remember to set a timer

Form the dough into a loaf and let it rise on the baking sheet while the oven heats up to 200° (Remember to take the sheets out)

 Bake for 40-45 minutes at 200°

(End)
Thyme pretzels
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
50 g of yeast

1 dL (boiling) water

2.5 dL buttermilk or yogurt

250 g flour

250 g sifted flour

1 teaspoon of salt

1 teaspoon of sugar

1½ tsp dried thyme

Method:
Put 1 dL (boiling) water in a Margrethe bowl and add 2.5 dL buttermilk

Stir a package of yeast into the liquid and add 250 g of sifted flour

Add 1 teaspoon of salt, 1 teaspoon of sugar and 1½ teaspoons of thyme

Knead in 250 g of flour until the dough is even and smooth

Let the dough rise for 30 minutes. Remember the minute

Divide the dough into 12 and roll out each part into a sausage which is shaped into a pretzel or a knot

Place the pretzels on baking paper or a clean baking sheet. If no baking paper is used, the base must be thoroughly dipped in flour

Let the pretzels rise while the top heats up to 220 º (approx. 10 minutes)

Bake for 20 minutes. Remember the minute

Cool on a baking rack

Better for lunch than breakfast.

(End)
Greek bread - nice bread for a party
(4 people) (Start 2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 0.6 L buttermilk

 50 g of yeast

 2 tablespoons (olive) oil

 1½ tablespoons salt

 1 kg of flour

Method:
Stir 50 g of yeast into 0.6 L of buttermilk

Add 2 tablespoons of (olive) oil and 1½ tablespoons of salt

Stir in 750 g of flour. It should not be kneaded, just mixed well into a sticky mass

Let the dough rise covered for 1 hour. Remember to set the timer

Knead approx. Add 250 g of flour until the dough comes together

Form the dough into a flat, round plate and fold one half over the disc. It should not reach all the way over. Sprinkle with flour and let the bread rise for 20 minutes. Remember to set a timer

Turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to take out the plates). When it is hot, bake the bread for 45-50 minutes until it sounds hollow at the bottom. Be careful not to disturb the flour on top when you pound it on the bottom, as it looks fine.

The bread is suitable for serving with food as it looks impressive.

(End)
Beetroot Brud - beautiful buns with beetroot
(12-16 pcs) (Start 2 hours before)

Ingredients:
 50 g of yeast

 5 dL of water

 1 kg of flour

 75 g sugar (1 dL)

 1½ tablespoons salt

 75 g pats of butter

 2 eggs

 150 g pumpkin seeds (or sesame seeds)

 2-300 g beetroot (or carrots)

Method:
Start by melting the butter over medium heat (4-5 out of 9). It should not bubble up.

 Put 5 dL of water in a Margrethe bowl and stir a packet of yeast into the water

 Come approx. ¾ of 1 kg of flour in the bowl and bowl

 1 dL sugar

 1½ tablespoons salt and

 in the melted butter

 Knead in the last flour until the dough is smooth and soft. Preferably 5 minutes of kneading.

 Let the dough rise for 1 hour. Remember to set a timer.

 Weigh out 150 grams of pumpkin seeds and find the 2 eggs

 Place baking paper on two baking trays

 Peel the beetroots and grate them roughly

 Put the grated beetroot in a bowl together with the pumpkin seeds.

 Break the eggs into the beetroot and mix well

Find a dull knife and spread the dough out on the table. (If you only have a sharp knife, spread the dough out on a large cutting board)

 Spread the beetroot-pumpkin-egg spread on the dough and pull the dough together around the spread into a large bun

Chop/cut the dough ball into pieces crosswise. It should look messy. Collect eggs that spill onto the table back into the clump

When everything is halfway mixed, put the dough in blobs on the baking sheets. The blobs should be about the size of a fist.
If necessary, watch a video about shaping the beetroot sprouts

 Let the balls (blobs) rise for another 45 minutes. Remember to set a timer.

Take out the plates and turn on the oven at 220° (200° with hot air)

 When the oven is hot, insert the plates and bake the buns for 12 minutes. Remember to set the timer.

 Change the plates and bake for a further 7 minutes until the buns are light brown on the bottom

Tastes especially good with brie.

(End)
Bagels
(16 pcs) (Start 3 hours before)

Ingredients:
 50 g of yeast

 2 dL milk

 3 dL of water

 3 teaspoons of salt

 2 teaspoons of sugar

 2 egg yolks

 950 g flour

Method:
 Start by putting 2 dL of milk and 3 dL of water in a Margrethe bowl (use possibly 1.2 dL of cold water and 1.8 dL of boiling water to end up at 37 º )

 Stir 50 g of yeast into the liquid

 Weigh out 950 g of flour and put half in the bowl

 Add 3 teaspoons of salt and 2 teaspoons of sugar

 Split two eggs and add the yolks to the bowl. Save the whites for brushing

 Knead in the rest of the flour until the dough is smooth and pliable

 Let the dough rise, covered, for 1 hour

 Divide the dough into 4 pieces, each divided into 4 pieces

 Form each piece into a neat bun

 Pinch a hole in each bun with your index finger and thumb and expand the hole until the bun has a bagel shape. The hole must be approx. 1/3 of the diameter

 Let the rings rise for half an hour

 Turn on the oven at 200° (Remember to remove the plates)

 Bring 5 cm of water to the boil in a large pot (the water should be about 1½ times the height of a raised bagel)

 Turn down to 5-6 out of 9 and cook 3 bagels at a time. They should cook approx. 1 minute and turn after approx. ½ minute.

 Place the cooked bagels on parchment paper on a baking sheet as they are done

 Brush with egg white and bake the pastries for 20-25 minutes. They can be sprinkled with sesame seeds or kalonji seeds ("Virgin-in-the-Green" seeds)

Tip: It does not matter if the hole closes during cooking. This makes them easier to eat with jam. The hole is there to distribute the heat evenly during cooking in my opinion

(End)
Accessories

Pasta on the saving method
(3 - 4 people) (Start ½ hour before)

Ingredients:
300 g store-bought pasta (this recipe cannot be used for homemade pasta, it will be sticky)

 water to cover the pasta

 1 teaspoon of salt

Method:
 Put 300 g of pasta in a pan

 Pour water so that the pasta is completely covered, but not much more

 Bring the water with the pasta to a boil

 Add 1 teaspoon of salt to the pan and stir. Put the lid on

 Set the timer for 8-12 minutes (look at the bag and add 1 minute)

 Put the plates on the lid so they can get warm. (It makes pasta dishes much tastier to eat on hot plates!)

 When the timer rings, taste a piece of pasta to see if it is tender. Let it sit a little longer if there is still too much bite

(End)
Rice
(3 - 4 people) (Start ½ hour before)

Ingredients:
3.75 dL water (Always 1.5 dL water for 1 dL rice)

 2.5 dL rice (Write down somewhere how much rice the people you are cooking for usually eat)

 1 teaspoon of salt

Method:
 Bring 3.75 dL of water to a boil in a small saucepan.

 Meanwhile, rinse 2.5 dL of rice in a strainer

 Put 1 teaspoon of salt on top of the wet rice (so as not to forget salt)

 When the water boils, add the rice and stir. Put the lid on

 Set the timer to 12 minutes and turn down to 1 (out of 9)

 Put any the plates on the lid so they can get warm

 When the timer rings, switch off the flame and reset the timer to 12 minutes

 The rice is ready when the timer rings, but they can easily stand for another quarter of an hour

(End)
Baked potatoes
(4 people) (Start just over 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
1 large baking potato per person

Method:
 Wash the potatoes

 Cut a cross in the top of each potato

 Put the potatoes in an ovenproof dish with a good distance

Put the potatoes in the oven at 225°C and bake them for approx. 1 hour and 15 minutes. Remember to set a timer.

 If the potatoes can be put in a cold oven, they should have 15 minutes more.

Serve with butter and salt and give each person a teaspoon to dig out the potato flesh

 If the potatoes are washed/scrubbed well, you can easily eat the skin

Tip: Mashed potatoes made from baked potatoes taste better than boiled potatoes.
When you have scraped out the potato pulp for the mashed potatoes, you can cut the empty skins into thick strips and brush them with soy sauce mixed with a little oil and paprika. Bake them for fifteen minutes in a 200°C oven and serve with salt and tabasco as a snack/starter.

(End)
Green salad
(4 people) (Start ¼ hour before)

Ingredients:
1-2 lettuce leaves per person

2-3 tomatoes

(Feta in cubes/olives/avo in cubes/chopped cashews/dried tomatoes/…)

(2 tbsp olive oil, 1 tsp vinegar and a sprinkle of salt)

Method:
(Take 2-3 leaves from a head of lettuce

Discard dead leaves and take new ones

Cut or tear the lettuce leaves into pieces (approx. 1.5 x 3 cm)

Dice 2-3 tomatoes

Mix lettuce and tomato in a salad bowl with a fork and spoon

Leave the fork and spoon in the salad so you can take them with you

(Sprinkle diced feta/olives/chopped cashew nuts/dried tomatoes/... over the salad)

Touch if necessary. a dressing of 2 tablespoons olive oil, 1 teaspoon vinegar and a sprinkle of salt

Serve the salad


Carrot salad with orange
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
1 orange

(1 lemon or lime)

(¼ tsp salt)

(1-3 tbsp sugar)

500 g carrots

Method:
Squeeze the juice from 1 apple and put it in a salad bowl (3L Margaret bowl size)

(Squeeze the juice of 1 lemon or lime and add the juice to the orange juice. Season with ¼ teaspoon salt and 1-3 tablespoons sugar)

Peel the carrots and grate them coarsely or finely on a grater. If you grate the carrots roughly, there is little to chew. It is a matter of taste

Add the grated carrots to the salad bowl and toss well

Tip: You can add 1-2 tablespoons of orange blossom water or rose water together with the orange juice. Rose water and orange blossom water are available from Turkish or Indian greengrocers

You can also add a small handful of raisins or chopped nuts or almonds. Or another diced orange.

Finally, you can sprinkle a bit of cinnamon or grated ginger over it if you want it to look nice and taste a little different. Remember to consider whether cinnamon or ginger fits with the main course

(End)
Butter-steamed scallions
(4 people) (Start ½ hour before)

Ingredients:
1 scallion

50 g of butter

2 dL water

½ tsp salt

(½ tsp pepper)

Method:
Put 2 dL of water in a large pot or a saute pan

Add 50 g of butter

And ½ teaspoon salt (and ½ teaspoon pepper)

Bring the water to a boil

While the water is boiling, remove the slatted leaves from the scallions. Rinse the scallop and cut into quarters

When the water boils, add the scallions and turn down to 3 (out of 9). Set a timer for 7 minutes

Serve a quarter of scallions per person as a side dish - or as a main course with side dishes

(End)
Mashed potatoes
(4 people) (Start ¾ hour before)

Ingredients:
 1 kg of potatoes

 1-2 dL milk or potato water

 (50 g butter)

 2-3 teaspoons of salt

Method:
There are two main types of potatoes: floury and hard to cook. The floury ones with a lot of starch are best for baked potatoes, mashed potatoes and French fries, so consider going for baked potatoes for mashed potatoes.
Unfortunately, baking potatoes are rarely available organically, so you have to make up your own mind about what weighs the heaviest. I usually go for organic first, as even hard-boiled potatoes make an okay mashed potato. It is only if you dig into the tips at the bottom that you should also start going for high-starch potatoes in my opinion

Start by peeling the potatoes

Cut the potatoes into cubes and put them in a pot and fill with water until it just covers

Set a timer and cook the potatoes for 20 minutes without salt , as the mashed potatoes will have a slimy consistency if you add salt too early

 Pour the water from the potatoes into a Margrethe bowl when the timer rings. (Or in the sink if you use milk)

 (Add 50 g of butter to the potatoes)

 Mash the potatoes with a potato masher or an electric whisk (See tip)

 When all the potato lumps have been mashed, whisk in 1-2 dL of milk or potato water until the consistency is suitable. It must not be too thin.

 Season with 2-3 teaspoons of salt. You need more salt in mashed potatoes than you think, but add a little at a time so that it doesn't suddenly become too salty

Tip: You can mash the potatoes with a saucepan or an electric whisk, but the more you stir the mashed potatoes, the tougher it becomes. Therefore, the best and fluffiest mashed potatoes can be obtained with a special tool that looks like an oversized garlic press. Look for them at thrift stores. Or buy a new one if you can afford it. They are worth the money if you like mashed potatoes :-)

Tip: Baked potatoes make a really good mashed potato, so if you have to bake anyway, you can put 1 kg of baking potatoes in the bottom of the oven (remember to cut a cross at the top) and bake them for 1 hour and 20 minutes. The baked potatoes can be stored in the fridge for a few days before they are used for mash.

Tip: Baked mashed potatoes get a delicious surface, so if you make mashed potatoes for something that needs to be in the oven anyway, grease a flat dish and put the mashed potatoes in and bake the dish for 20-25 minutes in the bottom of the oven on hot air until the surface has turned slightly brown here and there. (Remember to lower the temperature by 20° compared to the recipe if you use hot air)

Tip: There's more geekery about mashed potatoes and starch development, but that's going too far here. Borrow the book CookWise by Shirley O. Corriher at bibliotek.dk if you want to know more

(End)
Root vegetables in the oven
(3-4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 kg potatoes (preferably large)

 1 kg beetroot (preferably large) (The beetroot can be (partially) replaced by carrots and/or parsnip and/or parsley root. Or you can use 2 kg potatoes)

 2 tbsp olive oil

 2 tbsp oil (sunflower/grapeseed oil/...)

 1-2 tablespoons coarse salt (or better: flake salt)

Method:
 Fill a pot or a Margrethe bowl halfway with water

 Peel the root vegetables, rinse them and put them in the pan with water to prevent them from discolouring

 Cut the root vegetables into 1 cm thick slices lengthwise, and cut the slices into 1 cm thick sticks lengthwise. (Or better: use a french fry iron. See Tip)

 The root vegetable strips are returned to the water as they are processed

 Put baking paper in the bottom of three baking trays. They can be stacked on top of each other before adding root vegetables to save space in the kitchen

 Turn on the oven at 200°

 Put 1 tablespoon of olive oil and 1 tablespoon of another type of oil in a Margrethe bowl. (For some reason, the taste is better if you use a mixture than if you use each of the oils pure)

 Place a tea towel on the table and place a few handfuls of the root fruit strips on the tea towel and dry them. Continue until Margrethe's bowl is almost full

 Turn the root vegetables around in the oil and spread them in a layer on the baking trays with baking paper. It's good if they don't touch each other too much

 Put again 1 tablespoon of olive oil and 1 tablespoon of another kind of oil in a Margrethe bowl and dry the rest of the root vegetable strips and turn them in oil. Spread them on the baking sheets in one layer

 Place the baking trays in the oven with as much space between them as possible

 Close the oven and turn on hot air

 Set the timer for 25 minutes

 Turn off the hot air and check if the root vegetables are done. Perhaps the plates should be taken out one at a time and the root vegetable strips turned with two saucepans. Especially if they lie in layers or touch each other

 If they are not ready, put them back in the oven, turn on the fan and check them every 5 minutes until they are ready

 When they are finished, put one of the plates on the stove and pour the root vegetables from the other two plates on top. Pull the baking paper out of the stack and throw it away

 Sprinkle the pile with 1 tablespoon coarse salt (or flaked salt) and serve immediately. Serve with more coarse salt

Tip: If the root vegetables are served with hummus, there is a whole meal for 3-4 people. You can possibly take half a kilo of root vegetables more. Leftover root vegetables can be heated in the oven like other leftovers

Flake salt is expensive, but it is easier to sprinkle with and because the salt grains are flat, you get the same taste with less salt. It is a luxury product, but you spend quite a bit, so it is not a big burden on the budget. If you are blank when people ask what you want, it is an opportunity to write on your wish list

French fries irons cost DKK 1-500 and are worth the money if you have space in the kitchen. The type that slides the potato horizontally into the knives is a little more expensive, but is better to use. This was the cheapest french fry iron I could find of that type while writing Again something to write on the wish list

(End)
Hasselbach potatoes
(3 - 4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 1 kg of potatoes

 25 g of butter

 1½ tsp paprika

Method:
 Put the butter on a saucer so it can soften

 Place baking paper on a baking tray

Peel the potatoes

 Make grooves in the potatoes by cutting them halfway through as closely as possible

It may be easier to turn the potato 180° when you are halfway through. You can put the potato on top of a saucepan when cutting to avoid cutting all the way through. It is okay to start with approx. 10 thick grooves. Make the grooves thinner after you have made the dish a few times.

 Place the potatoes on the baking sheet as they are done

 Sprinkle 1½ teaspoons of paprika on the soft butter and knead the paprika in with a fork. The butter should not be too soft

 Spread the butter on the potatoes, an oblong blob on each

 Put the potatoes in the oven at 225° (Remember to take the plates out when you light the oven) for approx. 45 minutes. A little longer if they are large potatoes

(End)
Baked sesame potatoes
(4 people) (Start just over 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
4 large baking potatoes

4 tablespoons of milk

4 tablespoons sesame seeds

1 tablespoon salt

2 tbsp fresh dill (or 2 tsp dried)

Method:
 Wash the potatoes

 Cut the outline of a lid at the top of each potato instead of a cross as usual

 Put the potatoes in an ovenproof dish with a good distance

Put the potatoes in the oven at 225°C and bake them for approx. 1 hour and 15 minutes. Remember to set a timer.

 If the potatoes can be put in a cold oven, they should have 15 minutes more.

When the potatoes are taken out of the oven, a Margrethe bowl is found and the potatoes are hollowed out with a teaspoon. Place the potato flesh in the Margrethe bowl. Hold the potato skins with a potholder or kitchen towel as you carefully scoop out the skins into small bowls. Save the shells

 Mash the potato flesh with a ladle or a hand mixer

 Put 4 tablespoons of milk in the bowl for the potatoes

 Add 4 tablespoons of sesame seeds

 Add 1 tablespoon of salt and stir well

 Finally, stir 2 tablespoons of fresh, chopped dill (or 2 teaspoons of dried dill) into the mashed potatoes (can be omitted)

 Fill the mashed potatoes back into the shells and put them back in the oven for 10-15 minutes until the top has taken on a little color

Tip: If the potatoes are washed/scrubbed well, you can easily eat the skin

Tip: Baked sesame potatoes can be served with au gratin vegetables

(End)
Trimiti potato salad
(4 people) (Start 2-3 hours before)

Trimiti salad is a good way to use up leftover potatoes

The salad can be served alone as a light summer dish

Ingredients:
 1 kg potatoes, preferably boiled and cold

 1 large red onion or 3 spring onions

 4 tbsp olive oil

 1 tablespoon wine vinegar

 ½ tsp salt

 ½ tsp freshly ground pepper

 2 tablespoons finely chopped parsley

 3 tablespoons capers

Method:
 If the potatoes are not cooked, peel them and cook for 15-18 minutes, depending on size. Remember to set a timer

 Pour off the water and let the potatoes cool, uncovered

 Peel the red onion and cut it into thin slices. Divide the slices into rings. If spring onions are used, clean them and cut them into thin slices. Use as much of the green top as possible

 Chop 2 tablespoons parsley

 Put 4 tablespoons of olive oil in a large salad bowl (possibly a Margrethe bowl)

 Add 1 tablespoon of wine vinegar and ½ teaspoon of salt and ½ teaspoon of pepper and whisk the dressing together with a spoon

 Add 3 tablespoons of capers and the chopped parsley

 Add the onion rings and stir well

 Cut the potatoes into slices (and halve the slices if they are large potatoes)

 Fold in the potato slices and stir gently so that all the pieces are covered with dressing. I usually turn them as I slice them

 The salad can last a day or two in the fridge, and benefits from soaking at least an hour before serving

(End)
Chappaties - Indian flatbreads
(8 pcs) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 200 g wheat flour

 200 g whole wheat flour or graham flour

 ½ tsp salt

 2 ½ dL water

Method:
 Put 200 g of wheat flour in a Margrethe bowl

 Add 200 g of wholemeal flour

 Add 1 teaspoon of salt

 Measure out 2 ½ dL of water and put it in the bowl. Gather the dough until there is no dry flour or liquid water. The dough should not be kneaded, then the chappatis will be tough. It is ok to stir in more flour if the dough is too smooth or more water if it is too dry

 Cover the bowl with a plate and let it rest for 30 minutes

 Place a tea towel on the plate over the dough. Fold it so that the chappatis can be placed in the tea towel and kept warm when fried

 Divide the dough into 8 parts, which are shaped into buns

 Heat a pan while rolling out the first chappati into a circle. It must be 2-3 mm thick (slightly thicker than a 20-krone coin)

 When the pan is hot, place the unrolled chappati on the dry pan and turn down to 6 (out of 9)

 While it is frying, roll out the next one. Turn the chappati after a few minutes when it has small brown spots

 When the chappati has small brown spots on both sides, place it in the folded tea towel

 Repeat with the remaining lumps of dough and serve the chappatis hot. They taste best piping hot

(End)
Wheat tortilla - Mexican flatbread
(8 pcs) (Start 1; hour before)

Ingredients:
 3.5 dL flour

 1 teaspoon baking powder

 ½ tsp salt

 1.25 dL of water

Method:
 Put 3.5 dL of flour in a Margrethe bowl

 Add 1 teaspoon baking powder and ½ teaspoon salt and mix well

 Boil some water and add 0.5 dL of boiling water to ¾ dL of cold tap water

 Slowly stir the warm water into the flour and knead it into a smooth dough. It is not certain that all the water will be used

 Let the dough rest for 15-30 minutes

 Set out a plate and place a folded tea towel on the plate. Place a plate upside down over the tea towel.
By placing the tortillas in the tea towel as they are being baked, the steam from them will soften the tortillas when there is a plate over.
You can also use a large freezer bag if it is lighter than the top plate

 Divide the dough into 8 parts and form small balls

 Put flour on a table and roll the buns flat with a rolling pin until they are barely 2 mm thick
. With a little practice, you can roll out the buns as they are baked on the pan

 Put a pan on a burner and turn up to 6 (out of 9)

 When the pan is hot, add a tortilla. Small blisters should appear almost immediately. If it does not, the pan is too cold and must be turned up.

 Immediately flip the tortilla over and press down with a palette knife. Blisters should form where you press

 Flip the tortilla again and press again. Each tortilla should have approx. 1 minute on each side. Small brown spots should form, but they should not become too stiff.
If they turn black, turn them down.
When they are finished, put them in the tea towel between the two plates

 Continue until all the tortillas are baked

(End)
Homemade pasta
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 3 eggs

 1 tbsp oil

 1 teaspoon of salt

 300 g (durum) wheat flour

 (Parmesan cheese or Western cheese)

 (1-2 glasses of good pesto)

Method:
 Beat 3 eggs in a Margrethe bowl

 Put 1 tablespoon of oil and 1 teaspoon of salt in the bowl

 Weigh in 300 g of flour and put most of it in the bowl

 Start kneading the pasta dough together. Gradually add more flour and knead until the dough does not stick

 Clean the table and let the dough rest, covered, for 30 minutes

 Sprinkle the table with flour and roll out half of the dough with a rolling pin. Roll out to 1-1½ millimeters while turning the dough and keeping it well floured. The dough must not stick to the table

 When the dough has been rolled out, cut it into 1-2 cm wide strips with a butter knife or a pizza cutter. Watch the table. If you use a small spur, the edge will be finely wavy. The strips must not overlap each other. If necessary, put the finished pasta strips on a baking sheet and put them in the switched off oven to make more space

 Repeat with the other half of the dough (Small portions are easier to roll out. Once you have trained, you can roll out the whole portion at once - if you have space on the kitchen table)

 Boil 1 ½ L of water in a large pot

 When the water boils, add 1 teaspoon of salt and lift the pasta into the pan. Stir

 Set the timer for 5 minutes and turn it down to 4 (out of 9) when the water boils again

 Place a ladle over the pan and place 4 plates over the steam. The saucepan must be there so that the steam can escape so that it does not boil over

 Pour off the water when the timer rings and serve immediately

 It is often good with grated parmesan cheese on homemade pasta (or Western cheese from Thiese). If you buy two glasses of good pesto, homemade pasta can be an independent dish together with the cheese

(End)
Desserts and cakes

Pineapple in nice portions
(4 people) (Start ¼ hour before)

Ingredients:
 1 whole ripe pineapple

(You check in the store whether the pineapple is ripe by pulling on the middle leaves. If they come off easily, the pineapple is ripe. If they come off very easily, it may be overripe. If it feels soft, it is definitely overripe)

Procedure: ( Video of cutting pineapple )
 It looks fine to leave the top on, but it makes the cut a bit more difficult. Start by cutting off the top if you can't see anything else, or if it's wilted and ugly

 Place the pineapple on a large cutting board and cut it through the middle on the long joint with a large, sharp knife

 Halve each half on the long joint (repeat if the pineapple is large)

 Use a small, sharp knife to cut off the top, hard centimeter along the top (See video)

 Cut along the skin so that all the pulp comes off. A little bit of pineapple goes to waste, but it's not much and you can scrape it off the shell with a spoon after you've eaten the leftovers if you feel like it

 Leave the pulp on the shell and cut it into approx. 1 cm thick slices

 Push every other disc to each side (See video) so it looks nice

 Insert a toothpick into the piece closest to the top and serve

Tip: By eating the pieces from the top down towards the bottom, you usually get the sweetest pieces at the end

(End)
Watermelon ice cream
(4-8 people) (Start at least 5 hours before, 1 hour if using an ice cream maker)

Ingredients:
 1 watermelon (preferably seedless)

 1 kg of sugar (you hardly need to use all of it)

Method:
 Find a Margrethe bowl and weigh it. Write down the weight or remember it

 Cut the watermelon in half and scrape out the pulp with a spoon. Put it in the Margrethe bowl eventually. Avoid bringing kernels. Perhaps it is easiest to cut off pieces with a knife at first.

 Weigh the pulp by weighing the entire bowl and subtracting the weight of the bowl. (There are calculators in most phones)

 Put 100 g of sugar in the bowl for every 500 g of watermelon (Divide the weight of the watermelon by 5 and add that much sugar)

 Blend the pulp together with sugar with an immersion blender

 Put the ice cream in a bucket with a lid that can go in the freezer. The margrethe bowl can be used if necessary if plastic is placed over it

 Put the bucket in the freezer and stir approx. once an hour. Or leave the ice cream for at least 4 hours, thaw it for half an hour and then blend it with the stick blender (Be careful not to run hot. They usually can't handle more than 2 minutes before they have to cool for 5 minutes). Maybe put the ice in the freezer again for half an hour if it has melted a lot. You can easily leave the frozen, blended ice cream in the freezer for a few hours before it starts to become coarse in consistency again

 When putting the ice cream in the freezer, you can put plates in the freezer or the fridge so they don't cause the ice cream to melt when you serve it

 Serve it on chilled plates

Tip: The hollowed-out shells can be put in the freezer and act as a serving bowl: Place them on a plate and scoop the ice cream from the bucket into the shell. (Maybe it looks best with just a shell filled with top)

Instead of putting the ice in the freezer, you can use an ice machine. An ice machine costs approx. DKK 500 and is worth wishing for as a Christmas present if you love ice cream and have room in the freezer. There is a bowl that must live in the freezer so that it is always ready to freeze the ice cream and a motor part that lives in the kitchen cupboard and which stirs the ice cream while it freezes on the kitchen table. Sorbet ice cream is basically frozen juice, so it is easy to vary your ice cream by blending other kinds of fruit with sugar

(End)
Coconut macaroons
(approx. 10 pieces) (Start ½ hour before)

Ingredients:
 2 eggs

 160 g of sugar

 200 g coconut flour

 3 tablespoons of flour

 (½ plate of dark chocolate)

Method:
 Turn on the oven at 175° (remember to remove the plates)

 Put baking paper on a baking tray

 Beat 2 eggs in a Margrethe bowl

 Add 160 g of sugar

 Add 200 g of coconut flour

 Sprinkle 3 tablespoons of flour over the coconut flour and stir briefly with a fork. The mass should just be gathered, it should not be whipped/kneaded, because then the coconut macaroons will float out

 Scoop the coconut mixture into golf ball-sized mounds on the parchment paper using a spoon and fork. There must be a good distance between the tops (at least 1½ diameters between them)

 Bake approx. 12 minutes at 175°. Remember to set a timer

 Cool on a wire rack when they come out of the oven. You can optionally lift each macaron with a fork and place a piece of dark chocolate under each macaron while they are still warm to coat the base with chocolate. Or you can just put a cube of chocolate on top right when they come out of the oven

(End)
Homemade icecream
(4 people) (Start 5-6 hours before, 1 hour before if using ice machine)

Ingredients:
 4 sterile egg yolks

 60 g of sugar

 ½ l whipping cream

 ½ vanilla pod (1 tbsp vanilla sugar)

 (200 g finely chopped prunes or other fruit or 50-100 g coarsely chopped chocolate)

Method:
The vanilla beans are scraped out of the split half vanilla bean

Beat the egg yolks white with the sugar in a Margrethe bowl

Add vanilla beans (and possibly fruit). If necessary, blend the fruit with an immersion blender.

 Whip the cream stiffly in another Margrethe bowl and fold in

Freeze for at least 4 hours in the freezer. Stir once an hour to avoid ice crystals.

If no fruit is used: coarsely chop half a bar of chocolate and stir it in when the ice cream is three-quarters frozen

Serve with ice cream waffles or chocolate rolls.

(End)
Pancakes
(4 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 3 eggs

 4 dl milk

 3 tbsp water (or beer)

 ½ tsp cardamom (5-6 pods) or the grated rind of half a lemon

 1 teaspoon of sugar

 ¼ teaspoon salt

 200 g (3½ dL) flour

 approx. 25 g of butter

Method:
 Beat 3 eggs in a Margrethe bowl

 Measure out 4 dL of milk and add it to the eggs

 Add 1 teaspoon sugar and ¼ teaspoon salt

 Weigh out 200 g of flour (or measure out 3½ dL of flour)

 Grind 5-6 pods of cardamom and grind the black seeds in the mortar. Add the cardamom to the flour (the cardamom can be replaced by the grated rind from half a lemon)

 Put the flour in the Margrethe bowl and use an immersion blender to stir the dough until smooth

 Let the dough rest for half an hour to develop the gluten

 Place a plate on a cold burner and turn up to just under 1 (out of 9) to have a place to keep the pancakes warm

 Melt 25 g of butter in a pan and stir the melted butter into the dough

 When the butter has melted and the pan is hot, turn down to 6 (out of 9)

 Then pour approx. 1 dL of dough on the pan near the handle and distribute the dough by lifting the handle and tilting the pan from side to side

 Bake the pancake until it becomes matte on the entire surface. Loosen it along the edge with a palette knife and turn it over

 When it is finished baking, move the pancake to the hot plate

 Continue with another portion of dough until there is no more. For every second pancake, you can put half a teaspoon of butter on the pan to prevent them from burning. If you melt the butter before putting it on the pan, it oozes less

 Serve with sugar and jam or (chopped) chocolate and honey

Tip: You can put a vegetable stew in the pancakes and put them in an ovenproof dish. Sprinkle with grated cheese and put them in the oven at 200° until the cheese is nicely browned (15-20 minutes). It can be a good way to use leftover vegetables. Perhaps you should make a larger portion of pancake batter so that there is also someone for dessert :-)

(End)
Apple pie
(4 people) (Start 1 hour before)

Ingredients:
 125 g butter

 125 g of sugar

 125 g flour

 1½ teaspoons baking powder

 1 egg

 4 eating apples

 (tea) sugar for sprinkling

 cinnamon for sprinkling

 50 g almonds

Method:
Take 1 egg and butter out of the fridge. Preferably well before you start baking, so they get to room temperature. This makes it easier to stir sugar into the butter, and the egg does not cause the butter to solidify again when it is stirred in.

Put 125 g butter and 125 g sugar in a Margrethe bowl and stir it together with a hand mixer until it turns white and the sugar grains have almost dissolved

Weigh out 125 g of flour and add 1½ teaspoons of baking powder to the flour and stir well

Beat 1 egg in a cup and whisk it together so that you don't have to stir for too long when it's added. If you stir for too long, the flour develops gluten, and then the dough becomes tougher, which is not so delicious in cakes

First beat eggs and then flour in the bowl until the dough is uniform. It should be sticky

Grease a pie dish and spread half the dough in blobs on the bottom. It doesn't have to be even

Place a plate in the middle of the oven and turn it on to 180º

Rinse 4 apples and remove the stem, flower and core. Cut the apple into ½ cm thick slices and place the slices neatly on top of the dough in the pie dish

Spread the rest of the dough on top of the apples. It melts, so it doesn't have to be super evenly distributed

Sprinkle the cake with (tea) sugar and cinnamon and bake it at 180º for 15 minutes. Remember to set the timer

Meanwhile, cut 50 g (~1 dL) of almonds into strips lengthwise. They can possibly be slipped first. It is easiest to slip almonds if you pour boiling water over them twice. Let them soak for 2 minutes before pouring over them a second time

Take the pie out of the oven after 15 minutes and sprinkle with the slivered almonds

Bake it for a further 15 minutes. Remember the minute

Served with creme fraiche or whipped cream

(End)
Dream cake
(6-10 people) (Start 1½ hours before)

Ingredients:
 250 g flour

 3 teaspoons baking powder

 Grains of ½ stick of vanilla (2 teaspoons of vanilla sugar)

 250 g of sugar

 75 g of butter

 4 eggs

 2 dL whole milk


Topping

 125 g butter

 100 g coconut flour

 250 g brown sugar (Possibly half muscovado sugar)

 0.5 dL whole milk

Method:
 Feel free to start by taking the eggs and butter out of the fridge half an hour before - or in the morning of the day you are going to bake. The cake will be better, as the cold eggs do not cause the butter to solidify again, and eggs and butter can last more than a day on the kitchen counter

 Grease a dish of approx. 20×30 cm (like half a baking pan. The unbaked dough fills approx. 1.3 L and it should reach approx. ⅓ when poured in. If necessary, use two molds. If
necessary, pour 1.3 L of water into the mold before you grease it to assess whether there is enough space. If the mold is too full, the dough or topping will run out in the oven)

 Sprinkle flour into the greased tin and shake it around until the sides and bottom are covered. The excess flour is used in the next step

 Weigh out 250 g of flour and put it in a bowl or a liter measure

 Add 3 teaspoons of baking powder to the flour. (Possibly through a sieve if there are lumps in the baking powder)

 Split half a stick of vanilla with an herb knife, and scrape out the small black grains with the knife. Rub the grains into the flour and stir so that the baking powder is distributed evenly. Put the empty vanilla pod in a glass with ½ dL of sugar, and you will have vanilla sugar after a week :-) (Or just use 2 teaspoons of vanilla sugar if you already have some)

 Turn on the oven at 200°

 Measure out 2 dL whole milk

 Put 250 g of sugar in a Margrethe bowl

 Add 75 g butter in small pieces

 Beat butter and sugar white with a hand mixer

 Stir 4 eggs one at a time with the hand mixer. Beat well between each egg

 Stir in half of the flour mixture with the hand mixer

 Stir in half the milk

 Stir in the rest of the flour mixture

 Stir in the rest of the milk

 Pour the batter into the greased tin and use a scraper to remove the last batter. (Tilt and rotate the pans if using two small pans so the batter comes up the edge. I'm hoping this will prevent the cake from bulging in the middle, but not sure)

 Place the cake in the middle of the hot oven and bake for 25 minutes. Remember to set a timer

 When the cake has been placed, put 125 g of butter in a small pan

 Add 100 g of coconut flour

 Put 250 g of brown sugar in the pan (Half can possibly be muscovado sugar)

 Add 0.5 dL whole milk and stir with a whisk

 Turn on the flame to 9 (out of 9) and stir all the time

 When it's all melted together and maybe just starting to sizzle, take the pan off the heat

 When the timer rings, take out the cake and turn it up to 220°

 Spread the coconut topping over the entire surface of the cake and put it back in the oven for 10 minutes. Remember the minute

 Take the cake out when the timer rings and let it cool slightly before serving (at least fifteen minutes)

(End)
Breakfast

Original muesli
(1 person) (Start the night before)

Ingredients:
 1 apple

 1 dL oatmeal

 approx. 2 dL applesauce

 2-3 tablespoons of cream

 5-7 hazelnuts

Method:
 Start the night before you want muesli for breakfast

 Wash 1 apple and grate it roughly

 Put the grated apple in a tall glass

 Put 1 dL of oatmeal over the grated apple

 Fill the glass with applesauce until the oatmeal is covered

 Leave the jar in the fridge until the next morning

 Add 2-3 tablespoons of cream to the top of the glass

 Coarsely chop 5-7 hazelnuts and sprinkle them over the muesli in the glass

 Eat the muesli with a long spoon

(End)
Krüsli - muesli for festive occasions
(1 portion) (Start 1 hour before)

The company was ruled that they could not use the slogan "Tastes almost too good to be healthy" for the breakfast product that this recipe imitates.
So it's not something you should eat every morning, but a few times a year - or five - you may need something special :-)

Ingredients:
 350 g oatmeal

 200 g wheat (/barley/rye) flakes (or coarse rolled oats)

 100 g of sugar

 ½ dL wheat flour

 ½ dL rice flour (or wheat flour if you don't have rice flour)

 ¼ teaspoon salt

 1½ dL water

 1-2 tablespoons of honey

 1 dL oil (Not olive oil)

 75 g raisins

Method:
 Turn on the oven at 175°C. Remember to take the plates out

 Put a large piece of baking paper on a deep baking tray (baking pan)

 Put 350 g of oatmeal in a Margrethe bowl

 Add 200 g of wheat flakes

 Weigh out 100 g of sugar and put it in the bowl

 Add ½ dL wheat flour

 Add ½ dL rice flour (or more wheat flour)

 Put ¼ teaspoon of salt in the bowl and stir well

 Measure 1½ dL of water into a bowl

 Stir 1-2 tablespoons of honey into the water

 Add 1 dL of oil to the water-honey mixture

 Stir oil and water in the Margrethe bowl. Everything must be mixed well, but it does not matter if there are lumps a little smaller than walnuts. On the contrary

 Spread the contents of the Margrethe bowl evenly on the baking paper in the baking pan. It is important that the layer has the same thickness everywhere, as thin areas can be burned before the rest is finished

 Now the Krüslien must bake/dry several times

 Put the baking pan in the oven for 5-7 minutes. Remember the minute

 Take the baking pan out of the oven. Stir the Krüsli well and spread it again in an even layer. Put the baking pan in the oven for 5-7 minutes. Remember the minute

 Take the baking pan out of the oven. Stir the Krüsli well and spread it again in an even layer. Put the baking pan in the oven for 5-7 minutes. Remember the minute

 Take the baking pan out of the oven. Stir the Krüsli well and spread it again in an even layer. Put the baking pan in the oven for 5-7 minutes. Remember the minute

 The krüsli should not be brown, but not raw either. You have to try yourself. Maybe it should have a little more. (Remember minute clock)

 Allow the Krüsli to cool on the plate, then stir in 75 g of raisins

 The krüsli can be stored in a large mason jar or in a Margrethe bowl with a plate over it when it has cooled completely

Krüsli is eaten with milk or on yogurt

(End)
Drinking

Cold brewed tea
(1 L) (Start 24 hours before)

Ingredients:
 2 tea bags

 1 L of water

Method:
 Fill 1 L of water in a bottle with a wide opening. Certain soups or expensive ciders come in nice bottles

 Put two letters of tea into the bottle with the string hanging out

 Put the bottle in the fridge for 24 hours

 Pick up the tea bags and drink the tea

Cold-brewed tea has a finer taste than cold, regular tea. You can do the same with coffee or loose tea if you use a paper tea filter

(End)
Tan - Indian thirst quencher
(1 person) (Start 10 minutes before)

Ingredients:
 1 tablespoon yogurt

 1 tablespoon of sugar

 1 pinch of salt

 3-6 leaves of fresh mint

 1 glass of water

 ice cubes

Method:
 Put 1 tablespoon of yogurt in a blender or a glass for an immersion blender

 Add 1 tablespoon of sugar to the yogurt

 Add 1 pinch of salt

 Wash the mint leaves and add them to the blender as well

 Add 1 glass of water and blend until the mint leaves are finely chopped and the drink foams

 Add ice cubes and drink

Tan is very thirst quenching on a hot summer day. You can whip the ingredients together with a fork, but the taste will be softer with a blender

(End)
Apple drink
(1 L) (Start 15 minutes before)

Ingredients:
 3 apples

 1 lemon

 1 app plesin

 3 tablespoons of sugar

 ½ L of water

 (ice cubes)

Method:
 Cut the apple into rough cubes and discard the flower, stem and core

 Put the apple pieces in a blender

 Squeeze 1 lemon and add the juice to the apples

 Repeat with 1 apple

 Put 3 tablespoons of sugar and ½ L of water in the blender and blend everything

 Season with sugar and serve in a glass with ice cubes

(End)
Shelf drink - juice for mixing
(approx. 3 L) (Start 1 day before)

Ingredients:
 20 bunches of large bunches of elderflowers

 ½ kg brown sugar

 ½ kg regular sugar

 30 g citric acid

 2 organic lemons

 (5 cm ginger)

 1½ L boiling water

 (A juice stand and a juice bag)

Method:
 Pick 20 large bunches of elderflowers with scissors. Preferably somewhere where there is no heavy traffic or sprayed fields nearby

 Put the bunches in a large pot. They should not be rinsed

 Bring 1½ L of water to boil

 Pour ½ kg of brown sugar over the elderflowers

 Pour over ½ kg of regular sugar as well

 Sprinkle 30 g citric acid over

 (For an alternative taste, 5 cm of ginger can be grated over the elderflowers. Remember to peel the ginger first)

 Pour the boiling water over and stir well. Put a lid on the pan and leave it until the next day

 Strain the juice from the elderflowers into a Margrethe bowl. It's easiest with a juice bag on a stand, but a strainer can also do it. Then the juice just becomes a little more cloudy.

 Put a 2 L plastic bag in each of two empty milk cartons and pour juice in. Close with elastic, put a freezer label on the carton that says "Shelf drink", month and year and freeze the juice. If necessary, set an alarm in the calendar for each carton so that you remember that you have homemade juice.
November and at the end of January it's nice to have a little taste of summer :-)

 Store the juice you want to drink in the fridge and dilute it approx. 1:4 with water or 1:1 with buttermilk

(End)
Tips and tricks

Purchase
Check what you have in your cupboards and drawers before you buy, so you don't buy too much.

Have a snack before shopping. If you are hungry, you are all too easily tempted by things you don't really need.

Watch out for the 2 for ... offer. If you are not sure of using the extra thing, it is more expensive. But if the shelf life is long (1-2 years) and you can afford it, it often pays to hoard four (but rarely 8!!)

It can be difficult to choose between different products. Research suggests that we are happier if we can choose between 2-4 things than if there is no choice or too many choices.
You can limit the choices for yourself by looking for products that emphasize organic/fair trade/animal welfare/without additives.

Read the declaration on goods you do not know. Sometimes new items contain the strangest things. Slowly build up a library of known items and stick to them. Note: Start by assuming that the items you have always bought are ok. When you have become more accustomed to reading declarations, you can "go back" and evaluate familiar goods.

Be aware that there are "codes" in product names. If something is called a fruit drink there is very little fruit in it, while juice is pure fruit juice. Phrases such as With ... taste cover that there is rarely the said ingredient in it.

Energy content is usually per 100 g, but packs are rarely exactly 100 g. Remember to multiply up/down.

(End)
Basic ingredients
Always have basic ingredients in the kitchen (Indicative checklist below)

Immediately write things on the shopping list when you empty a package/bag/box/…

It is a good idea to have two of the most important things, so there is time to buy a new batch.

Ingredients you should always have in the kitchen cupboard:

White wheat flour - and wholemeal flour if you bake a lot

Oatmeal

Sugar - white and brown cane sugar

Nuts (almonds, hazelnuts, ...)

Sea salt

Oil - Both olive oil for salad dressing and grape seed oil for frying

Rice

Pasta (1-4 types)

Yeast - and/or sourdough

Onion

Garlic

Vinegar (Balsamic)

Tomato concentrate in tube

Fish sauce

Red curry paste

Soy sauce

Bouillon - Herbamare has the fewest additives

Baking soda


The most common spices:

Chili

Cinnamon

Cardamom (preferably whole)

Curry

Cilantro

Bay leaves

Oregano

Paprika

Pepper

Cumin

Thyme

Vanilla pod

(End)
Basic techniques - i.a. onions (almost) without tears
In this video I show a few very basic techniques used in the cookbook.
The video contains, among other things:

Chopping onions (almost) without tears
How to treat garlic 2:25
How to clean leeks 4:34
How to peel potatoes 6:03
How to easily serve a pineapple nicely 7:29
How to sharpen knives 9:49
The trick to fixing onions is to leave the root end alone. Either by cutting the top of the onion and peeling off the outer, brown layers like you peel a banana and then slice the onion, but stop approx. 1 cm before the root end is reached. You can then lay the root end down and cut off the last part next to the root.

Or you can cut out the root first by making a cone-shaped cut around it, and then treat the bulb as normal 2:07

None of the techniques completely remove the irritation from the eyes, but they can keep it down.

As suggested in the video, you can possibly get others to chop a lot of onions for you, and then freeze them in plastic bags in thin layers 1:14 . You don't need to thaw the onions (quite a lot) before you put them in the pan.

When I write that you have to heat the pan and then add oil, it is because there are small microscopic cracks at the bottom of all pans.
By heating the pan, many of the cracks are closed because the metal expands, and if you only add the oil after the cracks have closed, things burn less firmly at the bottom of the pan.
It takes a little practice to know how long to wait, but I hold my hand approx. 5 cm above the bottom with the palm downwards and in this way can gradually assess when it is time to add oil.
The pan must be hot, but not too hot.
If the oil starts to smoke when you put it in, the pan was too hot and you have to get a new pan, or cool it down and clean it before continuing. Oil that smokes has become so hot that unhealthy compounds have been able to develop and it should therefore be thrown away

Here is an interesting link about the difference between oils: Think: Use your cooking oils correctly

(End)
Good to know
It saves energy to use the oven's hot air setting, but you must remember to set the temperature 20° lower when using hot air, because heat distribution is more efficient.


Baking paper cannot withstand more than 220°. As I now bake a lot at 250° to get a good crust, I have almost stopped using baking paper. A trick to prevent the dough from sticking to the plate is to rub a tablespoon of flour into the clean baking plate. If you then make sure that there is flour on the bottom of the bread and buns (by dipping them in a pile of flour), they basically do not stick. If they do, you can loosen them with a palette knife before shaking them onto the wire rack . It's almost only beetroot buns and cookies that I still use baking paper for. It is cheaper, good for the environment and you avoid the substances the paper is impregnated with. In addition, always buy Swan-labelled baking paper to avoid fluorine compounds.


Roasted hazelnuts taste much better and it's easy to make perfectly roasted hazelnuts: When you've baked, you simply switch off the oven before placing a plate of hazelnuts in the middle of the oven. When the oven has cooled down, the hazelnuts are perfectly toasted and can be stored in a glass.


If you use real vanilla for cakes or ice cream, do not throw away the pod. Instead, cut it into 3 cm long pieces and put them in a small glass. Cover them with sugar and let them soak for a few weeks. Then you always have vanilla sugar. If you are making hot cocoa or strawberry jam, you can take a few pieces of used vanilla bean out of the glass and let them cook with it.


If you drink whiskey but can't afford single malt, you can - in addition to not drinking whiskey - significantly improve the taste of a cheap whiskey with the following trick. Aging in barrels for many years gives compounds in the whiskey reminiscent of vanilla. Therefore, you can let the whiskey steep with half a vanilla pod for a week (first use the vanilla seeds in the vanilla pod for a dessert or ice cream). It is not legal for producers to sell whiskey flavored as whiskey, but if you intend to drink it yourself, there is no problem.

Fresh coconuts should slosh when shaken. If they don't slosh, they're bad.
To get the thin coconut milk (not to be confused with the coconut milk used in cooking) out, you drill out two of the "eyes" with a screwdriver.
Shake the nut over a glass until the liquid has dripped out. It may be necessary to drill the holes again. WAIT to drink the milk until you have opened the nut and seen that it is not moldy.
To open a coconut, you hit it with a smallhammer while holding it in your hand. With many small, sharp blows, the shell can be loosened all the way around if you turn the nut while striking. If you use a large hammer, the energy goes straight through the nut and ends up in your fingers. Ouch! Perhaps you can use a stone the size of a hen's egg to hit, but a pin hammer is best.
You can peel the brown layer off the coconut pieces with a paring knife and store the coconut pieces in water in a container in the fridge for a week.

(End)
Health
Always cool down leftovers quickly and put them in the fridge. In practice, this means: Let them stand on the kitchen counter for an hour and put them in the fridge to be lukewarm. It might be a good idea to set a timer so that you don't forget them for several hours. It is stupid to put hot leftovers in the fridge, as it heats up the other things in the fridge and uses extra electricity. There is also almost no difference in how quickly something cools on the kitchen table and in the fridge when the temperature is above 30 º C.

It is a good idea to rinse rice before putting it in the pot, as you can then remove some of the arsenic that is naturally found in the soil in the places where rice is grown. Arsenic is carcinogenic, so it's good to avoid, but there's no need to be hysterical. Basmati rice probably has the lowest content of arsenic - and they taste the best!


If you have problems keeping your weight off, The Hacker's Diet - How to lose weight and hair through stress and poor nutrition is worth reading.

The book can be downloaded for free and reviews nutrition and how to motivate yourself to start exercising.

It was written by an engineer who lost 35 kg after he treated his excess weight as a technical problem.

Since it is written by someone who is probably autistic and possibly has ADHD, the tone is convincing for people on the spectrum.

And it's pretty funny if you're into dry engineering humor. As implied in the sub-title.

A quote from the preface: In less than a year, totally under my own direction and without any drugs or gimmicks, I went from 215 pounds to 145 and achieved physical fitness. Since then, I've kept my weight right where I want it with none of the yoyo swings I'd suffered in the past. All of this was accomplished in less than 15 minutes a day, and without any significant changes in the way I choose to live my life.

(End)
Reduce stress while cooking
It is a good idea to find all the ingredients before you start.

Place them by the sink or stove, depending on what needs to be done with them.

That way, you can see if all the ingredients are there, and you don't have to dig around for anything in the cupboard while the pot is burning.

Immediately put the rest of the package or bag in place when you have found the amount of ingredients you need.

It's stressful to have the table filled with things you don't need

Clean and chop the ingredients to be cleaned and chopped before proceeding.

Rinse or wash dishes as you finish cooking utensils.

It is stressful to have the table filled with dirty things


To sum up:

 Find all the ingredients - also for the accessories!

 Put away everything you don't need

 Prepare the ingredients

Measure up

Clean and chop

Beat/grate/thrust in a mortar

 Clean up the kitchen utensils you have used so far and rinse/wash them

 Start cooking

(End)
The hardest thing of all: Heating leftovers
It can be just as difficult to keep track of heating leftovers as it is to keep track of a recipe. On the other hand, it can be time-saving to cook for several days, and it can even be delicious to have several things to choose from.

I managed to make lasagna from scratch with homemade pasta sheets, even though there were plenty of leftovers to eat because I couldn't figure out how to heat the leftovers.

The solution was to get pyrex containers (Ocuisine) with lids, so you just have to remove the lid and put them in a cold oven and turn it on. Another smart thing is that you can also see the contents, which makes it easier to remember and overview leftovers. (It might be a good idea to store them with a piece of cloth in between in the cupboard to avoid chipping off. They are quite solid, but you can chip at the edge.)

An oven thermometer also helps tremendously. You insert the tip into the middle of the residue that contains the most water (as water requires the most energy to heat up), and set the alarm to 70° C.

The cheapest oven thermometers are best here, as the expensive ones have all sorts of settings you don't need and which can be difficult to understand. You just need one that beeps when a certain temperature is reached.

Unfortunately, the wire that goes into the oven doesn't last more than a year, so lately I've bought a grill thermometer instead. Then I set a timer for 20 minutes when I put the food in, and measure the temperature when it beeps. If the temperature is not quite 70° yet, it will take 5 more minutes before I measure again, and possibly repeat.

While the oven and the leftovers are heating up, you can set the table. If necessary, remember to put soy sauce, mango chutney, sweet chilli sauce and other things on the table that can spice up the leftovers.

If there aren't quite enough leftovers, a bag of chips or a pack of grissini might fill the last hole in the stomach.

If you heat leftovers in a pan, a remote thermometer can be a good investment. The cheapest cost approx. DKK 100 in a hardware store and you just point at the thing you want to measure the temperature of and press the button and then it shows the temperature of the surface.
Note that distance thermometers are not accurate on smooth surfaces. You have to put oil in a pan if you want to measure the temperature of the bottom accurately.

(End)
